<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89814-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-14-89.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 155 / Monday, August 14, 1989/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 264, 265 and 270 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL-3576-2] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2050-AB71 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Delay of Closure Period for Hazardous Waste Management Facilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) is today amendingportions of the closure requirements under subtitle C of the Resource Conservationand Recovery Act (RCRA) applicable to owners and operators of certain typesof hazardous waste facilities. Today's final rule allows, under limitedcircumstances, a landfill, surface impoundment, or land treatment unitto remain open after the final receipt of hazardous wastes in order toreceive non-hazardous wastes in that unit. This final rule details thecircumstances under which a unit may remain open to receive non-hazardouswastes and describes the conditions applicable to such units.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE:</T2> November 13, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> The public docket for this rulemaking is availablefor public inspection in Room S-201, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency,401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC 20460, from 9:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m., Mondaythrough Friday, excluding Federal holidays. The docket number is F-88-DCPP-FFFFF.The public must make an appointment to review docket materials by calling(202) 475-9327. The public may copy materials at the cost of $.15 per page.Charges under $15.00 are waived.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> The RCRA Hotline at (800) 424-8346(toll free) or (202) 382-3000 in Washington, DC, or Permits Branch, Officeof Solid Waste (OS-341) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street,SW., Washington, DC 20460, (202) 382-4740.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> <ITAG tagnum="74">Preamble Outline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L0,ns,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s100</C> <H1> </H1> I. Authority II. Background III. Summary of Today's Rule IV. Section-by-Section Analysis <ITAG tagnum="12">A. Applicability </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. Surface Impoundments Not Meeting Liner and Leachate CollectionSystem Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">2. Landfills </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">3. Land Treatment Units </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">4. Other Treatment and Storage Facilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">B. Part 264 Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. General Conditions for Delay of Closure (andSection; 264.113(d))</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Demonstrations for Extensions to Closure Deadlines (andSection; 264.113(d)(1))</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(1) Design Capacity </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(2) Receipt of Non-Hazardous Waste Within One Year </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(3) Compatibility of Wastes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(4) Incompatibility of Closure with Continued Operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Continued Compliance with Subtitle C Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Changes to Facility Plans (andSection; 264.113(d)(2)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">d. Exposure Assessment Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">e. Permit Revisions (andSection; 264.113(d)(4)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">2. Additional Requirements for Surface Impoundments that do not MeetLiner and Leachate Collection System Requirements (andSection; 264.113(e))</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Contingent Corrective Measures Plan (andSection; 264.113(e)(1)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Alternatives </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(1) Alternative 1_Removal of Hazardous Wastes (andSection; 264.113(e)(2))</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">(a) Liquid and sludge removal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">(b) Relationship to the mixture rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(2) Alternative 2_Flushing Hazardous Wastes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(3) Alternative 3_Leaving Hazardous Wastes in Place </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Corrective Action Requirements (andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(4)and (5)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(1) Corrective Action Trigger (andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(4)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(2) Other Media </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">(3) Additional Corrective Measures Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">d. Evaluating the Progress of Corrective Action (andSection; 264.113(e)(5), (6), and (7)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">3. Notification of Closure (andSection; 264.112(d)(2)) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">C. Part 270 Permit Modification Requests (andSection; 270.42) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">D. Conforming Changes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. Conforming Changes to Part 265 Interim Status Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Eligibility </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Ground-Water Monitoring and Corrective Action </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Applicability to New Interim Status Units </ITAG>V. State Authorization <ITAG tagnum="12">A. Applicability of Rules in Authorized States </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">B. Effect of Rule on State Authorizations </ITAG>VI. Executive Order 12291 VII. Paperwork Reduction Act VIII. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Authority </ITAG>These regulations are issued under the authority of sections 1006, 2002(a),3004, 3005, and 3006 of the Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended by theResource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended (42 U.S.C. 6905,6912(a), 6924, 6925 and 6926). <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background </ITAG>Section 3004 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) requiresthe Administrator of EPA to promulgate regulations establishing such performancestandards applicable to owners and operators of hazardous waste treatment,storage, or disposal facilities (TSDFs), as may be necessary to protecthuman health and the environment. Section 3005 requires the Administratorto promulgate regulations requiring each person owning or operating a TSDFto have a permit, and to establish requirements for permit applications.Recognizing that a period of time would be required to issue permits toall facilities, Congress created ``interim status'' in section 3005(e)of RCRA. Owners and operators of existing hazardous waste TSDFs who qualifyfor interim status will be treated as having been issued permits untilEPA takes final administrative action on their permit applications. Theprivilege of carrying on operations during interim status carries withit the responsibility of complying with appropriate portions of the section3004 standards. EPA has issued several sets of regulations to implement these RCRA requirements.These regulations include part 264 (which provides standards for ownersand operators of TSDFs that have been issued RCRA permits) and part 265(which provides standards for owners and operators of interim status TSDFs)of title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations (CFR). Subpart G withinthese two parts addresses requirements for closing TSDFs and maintainingthem after closure if necessary. The subpart G requirements in both ofthese parts, particularly the closure deadlines found in andSection;andSection;264.112, 265.112, 264.113, and 265.113, will be affected by the promulgationof today's final rule. The requirements of andSection;andSection; 264.113 and 265.113 were last amendedon May 2, 1986 (51 FR 16422). In the May 1986 rulemaking, the Agency madeconforming changes to the requirements in andSection;andSection; 264.113 (a)and (b) and 265.113 (a) and (b) requiring that closure be completed within180 days after the final receipt of hazardous wastes rather than afterthe final receipt of wastes (51 FR 16422). After promulgation of the May2, 1986 amendments, lawsuits were filed challenging the requirement thatclosure be completed within 180 days after the final receipt of hazardouswaste. The litigants, Union Carbide Corporation (Union Carbide) and theChemical Manufacturers Association (CMA), contended that this change wasinconsistent with the Congressional intent evidenced in the legislativehistory of the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments (HSWA) which amendedRCRA in 1984 regarding closure of surface impoundments. Further, the litigationcontended that the change was unnecessary to protect human health and theenvironment, and that it would discourage waste minimization and othergoals Congress expressed in HSWA. EPA entered into settlement discussionswith the litigants. To date, no settlement of the case has been reached.On June 6, 1988 (53 FR 20738), the Agency proposed a rule amending theparts 264 and part 265 closure requirements to allow owners and operatorsof landfills and surface impoundments meeting specific eligibility criteriato delay closure of their facilities to receive non-hazardous waste followingthe final receipt of hazardous waste. The rule proposed general requirementsfor surface impoundments and landfills wishing to remain open to receivenon-hazardous wastes and additional requirements for surface impoundmentsthat did not meet the part 264 liner and leachate collection system requirements.The Agency received 24 comment letters in response to the June 6, 1988proposal. The comments received were filed in Docket andplusmin;F-88-DCPP-FFFFFand are available for public review. Additionally, the Agency has prepareda summary of these comments and the Agency's response in a document entitled``Response to Comments to June 6, 1988 Proposed Rule to Allow Delay ofClosure Following the Final Receipt of Hazardous Wastes (53 FR 20738).''This document is available for public review at the EPA RCRA Docket (Room2427), 401 M Street, Washington, DC 20460. In brief, most commenters supported allowing certain hazardous waste managementunits the opportunity to delay closure to receive only non-hazardous wastes.These commenters felt that the proposal provided owners and operators ofthese hazardous waste management units with needed flexibility in theirmanagement operations. These commenters also agreed with the Agency positionthat the proposed requirements would provide adequate protection of humanhealth and the environment. Commenters opposed to the proposal generally objected to its applicabilityto surface impoundments not satisfying the liner and leachate collectionaspects of the minimum technology requirements (MTR). Commenters expressedconcern that these units could not be operated in a manner that would beadequately protective of human health and the environment. These commentersalso contended that the Agency did not have the authority to allow theseunits to remain open, since RCRA section 3005(j) required them either tobe retrofitted to meet MTR, or to cease the receipt of hazardous wasteon November 8, 1988. The Agency has carefully considered the comments receivedand is today finalizing the proposal with a number of changes which arediscussed further in later sections of this preamble.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Summary of Today's Rule </ITAG>Today the Agency is promulgating requirements amending 40 CFR 264.113 and265.113, that will allow certain landfills, surface impoundments, and landtreatment units to be eligible to delay closure to receive only non-hazardouswaste after the final receipt of hazardous waste. The Agency believes thatthese units, including surface impoundments that do not meet the part 264liner and leachate collection system elements of the minimum technologicalrequirements (MTR) specified by RCRA section 3004(o), but from which hazardouswastes have been removed, can operate in an environmentally protectivemanner by meeting the requirements set forth in this rule. The requirementspromulgated in today's rule specify general conditions applicable to allsurface impoundments, landfills and land treatment units delaying closure,with additional conditions imposed on surface impoundments that do notmeet part 264 liner and leachate collection system requirements. Owners and operators of facilities delaying closure under today's rulewill be required to operate under the full permit requirements of 40 CFRpart 264 (or part 265 requirements until a permit is issued), includingcorrective action requirements. In addition, surface impoundments not incompliance with liner and leachate collection system requirements willbe required to remove all hazardous waste to the extent practicable. Facilitiescurrently in interim status that meet the requirements of today's rulemay delay closure while the permit application is being reviewed. The general requirements in andSection;andSection; 264.113(d) and 265.113(d)applicable to all owners and operators wishing to delay closure are beingfinalized as proposed with a few minor clarifying changes. These requirementsare illustrated in Exhibit 1. Owners and operators wishing to delay closureunder today's final rule must request a permit modification at least 120days prior to final receipt of hazardous wastes, or, if the facility isin interim status, submit an amended part B application (or a part B applicationif one has not been previously submitted) at least 180 days prior to thefinal receipt of hazardous wastes. Owners or operators of units that receivedtheir final volume of hazardous wastes before promulgation of today's rulemay delay closure if they submit the required demonstrations and permitmodification (or amended part B application) within 90 days of today's<T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Facilities which lost interim statusprior to today's notice are ineligible to delay closure. These units may,of course, submit permit applications, which, if approved, could allowthem to receive non-hazardous wastes pursuant to the applicable requirementsof today's rule.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 339</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLINC CODE 6560-50-C </ITAG>The request for a permit modification or the amended part B applicationmust include demonstrations that the unit has the existing design capacityto manage non-hazardous waste, and that the non-hazardous wastes are notincompatible with any hazardous or non-hazardous wastes remaining in theunit. In addition, certain facility information including the waste analysisplan, ground-water monitoring plans, closure and post closure plans andcost estimates, financial assurance demonstrations and the human exposureassessment information required under RCRA section 3019, must be updatedas necessary to account for receipt of only non-hazardous waste. Owners and operators of units remaining open under today's rule must alsocontinue to comply with all applicable part 264 permit requirements (orpart 265 requirements until a permit is issued). Units may not remain opento receive only non hazardous wastes if the Regional Administrator determinesthat continued operation of the unit or facility cannot be conducted inaccordance with these requirements ensuring the protection of human healthand the environment. Finally, units must be closed in accordance with theapproved closure plan and the subpart G regulations applicable to hazardouswaste management units, including notification of the Agency in accordancewith the deadlines specified in andSection;andSection; 264.112(d)(1) and 265.112(d)(1).Additionally, the owner or operator must initiate closure under the followingcircumstances: A request to modify the permit to manage only non-hazardouswastes is denied; the permit is terminated or is revoked at any time; aRCRA permit is denied for interim status facilities; or interim statusis otherwise terminated. Closure must be conducted in accordance with theapproved closure plan and the deadlines currently in andSection; 264.113(a) and (b) or andSection; 265.113 (a) and (b). Today's rule also establishes additional requirements applicable to surfaceimpoundments that do not satisfy the liner and leachate collection systemrequirements specified under RCRA section 3005(j) or have not receiveda waiver from these requirements, but wish to delay closure to receivenon-hazardous waste. These additional requirements, including removal ofhazardous waste, accelerated corrective measures, and strict limitationson continued operations following detection of a release from the unit,will ensure that these units are adequately protective of human healthand the environment. The specific requirements are illustrated in Exhibit2 and summarized briefly below.  <ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M 001 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 342 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-C    </ITAG>Owners and operators of surface impoundments not meeting liner and leachatecollection system requirements must prepare and submit a contingent correctivemeasures plan with their request to modify their permit (or for interimstatus facilities, with their amended part B application). The plan mustinclude a description of corrective measures that can be implemented quicklyif a release is detected and, if waste may continue to be received, a demonstrationthat continued receipt of wastes following detection of a release willnot impede implementation of the corrective measures. (The contents ofthe plan are discussed in more detail in IV.B.2.a of today's preamble).Under the final rule, owners and operators of surface impoundments notmeeting double liner and leachate collection system requirements and whowish to delay closure must remove all hazardous liquids and remove allsludges from the impoundment to the extent practicable. If a release isdetected either prior to or after final receipt of hazardous wastes ata surface impoundment from which hazardous wastes have been removed, correctivemeasures must be implemented within one year from the date of release.Continued receipt of non-hazardous wastes while corrective measures arebeing implemented may occur only if the owner or operator already has anapproved contingent corrective measures plan (or a full corrective actionplan) that accounts for the continued receipt of non-hazardous wastes anddemonstrates that such continued receipt of wastes will not impede theprogress of the corrective action. If the corrective measures plan hasnot been approved, receipt of waste must cease until such a correctivemeasures plan has been approved.If an owner or operator fails to make substantial progress in conductingcorrective action, either by failure to initiate actual remediation orcontainment activities within the first year and/or subsequently failingto implement actions leading to substantial progress towards achievingthe facility's ground-water protection standard (GWPS) or background levels,if applicable, he must initiate closure of the impoundment in accordancewith the requirements of subpart G of part 264 or 265. Substantial progresstowards achieving the facility's GWPS or background levels will be determinedon a case-by-case basis. The achievement of substantial progress will bemeasured by whether the owner or operator has corrective action measuresin place within one year, and has met significant plan milestones or deadlinesin the compliance schedule, permit, or enforcement order that establishestimeframes for achieving the facility's GWPS, or background levels. Today'srule also includes administrative procedures providing opportunity forpublic comment on the Regional Administrator's decision that substantialprogress has not been made and that closure of the unit is therefore required.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Section-by-Section Analysis </ITAG>The following sections of this preamble address the major issues raisedby commenters on the proposed rule and present the Agency's response tothese major issues and rationale for changes to the proposed rule. Thepreamble is arranged in a section-by-section sequence for ease of reference.Section A addresses the applicability of the rule. Section B discussesthe part 264 technical requirements applicable to permitted facilities.The part 270 procedural requirements applicable to permitting are addressedin section C. Section D discusses the conforming changes to 265 interimstatus standards. The requirements proposed in parts 264 and 265 are substantivelyidentical, but have slightly different procedural requirements. A. Applicability Today's rule is restricted to permitted and interim status landfill, landtreatment, and surface impoundment units that: (1) Are in compliance withapplicable permit or interim status requirements (except double liner requirements);(2) cease to receive hazardous wastes; and (3) will subsequently receiveonly non-hazardous waste. The proposed rule did not extend the option todelay closure to land treatment units, but specifically requested commentson whether the option should be available to such units. After consideringpublic comments received, the Agency has decided to allow land treatmentunits to delay closure if they satisfy the eligibility criteria in andSection;264.113(d) or andSection; 265.113(d). This change is discussed in greaterdetail in section IV.A.3. below. The rule does not extend the option to delay closure to units that lostinterim status. Today's rule also does not extend the option to delay closureto manage only non-hazardous wastes to storage or treatment tanks, containerstorage areas, waste piles, or incinerators. If owners or operators ofsuch units wish to receive non-hazardous wastes after the final receiptof hazardous wastes, they must first comply with the current closure requirements.The Agency believes that the activities necessary to close storage unitsand incinerators (e.g., waste removal and decontamination) are compatiblewith the future use of the unit and therefore requiring these units toconduct closure prior to receiving only non-hazardous wastes will not imposean undue burden on owners or operators. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Surface Impoundments Not Meeting Liner and Leachate CollectionSystem Requirements </ITAG>The proposal required surface impoundments not meeting the MTR liner andleachate collection system standards to meet the general conditions applicableto all units (andSection;andSection; 264.113(d) and 265.113(d)) as well asadditional requirements (andSection;andSection; 264.113(e) and 265.113(e)).The proposed rule (Option 3, andSection; 264.113(e)(3)) allowed impoundmentsin which wastes remained in place (i.e., disposal impoundments) to delayclosure only if they were not leaking at the time of the final receiptof hazardous waste. As described below, the requirements of andSection;andSection;264.113(e) and 265.113(e) have been modified in the final rule in responseto comments received on the proposal.Many commenters favored the provision of the proposal allowing non-MTRsurface impoundments to delay closure and provided anecdotal informationin support of it. Other commenters opposed the proposal, expressing concernthat it would adversely impact human health and the environment. Thosecommenters asserted that the proposed rule would violate the requirementsin RCRA section 3005(j) which require that surface impoundments that havenot met MTR cease receipt, storage, and treatment of hazardous wastes onNovember 8, 1988. Commenters further argued that because all hazardouswastes would not be removed from the impoundment (for instance, under oneof the options, no hazardous wastes were required to be removed), and becausethe facility would not cease activities that involve the management ofthe remaining hazardous wastes, the unit should be considered an activehazardous waste surface impoundment and therefore would be in violationof section 3005(j) of RCRA. These commenters further asserted that theproposal violates RCRA section 1003(a)(5) because the proposal achievesprotection of human health and the environment by remediating releases,rather than by preventing releases, which they argued is required by thestatute. One of these commenters also questioned the Agency's technical judgmentin allowing hazardous waste to remain in surface impoundments lacking doubleliners and leak detection systems. The commenter noted that the Agencypreviously has been unwilling to rely solely on ground-water monitoringand corrective action to detect and cleanup releases, favoring insteada combination of design and operating requirements to minimize the potentialfor releases. The commenter also pointed out that the Agency had not presentedany data with this rulemaking indicating that the Agency now found thatground-water monitoring and corrective action were more effective thanit believed in the past. Finally, the commenter expressed concern thatplacing additional liquid non-hazardous wastes into a surface impoundmentcontaining hazardous wastes could increase the pressure head and, consequently,increase the chances that hazardous constituents from the hazardous wasteswould escape into the environment. The Agency is not persuaded by the commenters' legal arguments based onsection 3005(j). The Agency does not believe that the use of the term ``storage''in RCRA section 3005(j) bars the continued receipt of non-hazardous wastesby impoundments that may contain hazardous wastes. The statute clearlyrequires that non-MTR surface impoundments cease receiving hazardous wastesby November 8, 1988, and all non-retrofitted impoundments must comply withthis requirement. The statute does not itself require closure of theseunits. In a colloquy clarifying statutory language, Senators Randolph andChafee indicated that the intent of the provision was not to require retrofittingfor hazardous waste impoundments that receive or store hazardous wasteprior to November 8, 1988, but cease to receive hazardous waste after thatdate, and that requiring such closure would not be necessary if continuedwaste management in the impoundment were conducted in a manner ensuringcontinued protection of human health and the environment (130 Cong. Rec.S9182 daily ed. July 25, 1984). The Agency does, however, agree with the commenters that section 1003(a)(5)establishes the goal of managing hazardous waste properly in the firstplace, ``thereby reducing the need for corrective action at a future date.''However, the Agency believes that Congress intended to allow the Agencyto determine the type of regulatory controls needed to provide ``propermanagement'' for each type of hazardous waste management unit. This provisiondoes not prohibit non-retrofitted surface impoundments from delaying closureto receive non-hazardous wastes. Closure of these units need not be requiredif the Agency determines that the wastes in the impoundments can stillbe managed in such a way as to reduce the need for future corrective action.The Agency has re-evaluated the proposal in light of the technical andpolicy concerns raised in the comments. Upon reconsideration, the Agencyhas determined that only those non-retrofitted impoundments that meet theremoval requirements described in Option 1 of the proposal will be eligibleto delay closure. Surface impoundments from which wastes are not removedwill not be permitted to delay closure. Further, flushing of impoundmentsto achieve only a 95 percent volume displacement is not sufficient underthe final rule as evidence of waste removal. EPA, as noted by the commenters, generally has adopted regulatory requirementswhich impose both prevention and detection and remediation requirementsfor land disposal units. This position was first articulated in the Agency'sJuly 26, 1982 rulemaking establishing standards for land disposal facilities(47 FR 32274). The 1982 rule promulgated two sets of standards for landfills,surface impoundments, waste piles, and land treatment units. The designand operating standards were intended to minimize the formation and migrationof leachate and thus reduce the likelihood of releases, while the ground-watermonitoring and response requirements were promulgated to ensure that releaseswould be detected and corrective action measures implemented in the eventof a release. The Agency reiterated its position on these dual goals ofprevention and protection in its May 2, 1986 rule establishing additionalclosure, post-closure care, and financial responsibility requirements forhazardous waste facilities. In the preamble to the 1986 final rule, theAgency stated that ``the hazardous waste regulations incorporate a two-part`prevention and care' system whose overall goal is to minimize the formationand migration of leachate to the adjacent subsurface soil, ground water,or surface water.'' (51 FR 16432) The Agency also relied on this positionin the May 29, 1987 (52 FR 2218), proposal to extend double liner and leachatecollection standards to certain new, replacement, and expansion landfillsand surface impoundments not required to meet these standards under section3004(o). The Agency also agrees with the commenters that proposed Options 2 and3 failed to require measures sufficient to prevent releases from impoundments.Consistent with previous policies, EPA is not willing to rely solely ondetection and remediation to provide protection for human health and theenvironment at non-retrofitted impoundments which retain significant amountsof liquid. Under both of these options, particularly Option 3, significantamounts of hazardous liquids would remain in surface impoundments thatlack liners and leachate collection systems or have liners that do notmeet the standards that EPA would require for new units. EPA shares thecommenter's concern that adding additional non-hazardous liquids couldincrease the pressure level in these impoundments thereby increasing thepotential for releases of the remaining hazardous wastes from these impoundments.On re-examination the Agency no longer believes that the enhancements tothe remediation process that the Agency had proposed (such as acceleratedcorrective action) are sufficient to mitigate the possibility that a releasemay escape early detection and prompt remediation. Consequently, the Agencybelieves that protection of human health and the environment requires promptclosure of impoundments retaining significant amounts of hazardous waste.Closure will supply necessary ``preventative'' measures by requiring theowner or operator to either remove all hazardous wastes and waste constituentsor to eliminate all free liquids and install an impermeable cap to reducethe potential for future releases of hazardous constituents.The Agency continues to believe that proposed Option 1 does, however, requiresufficient preventative measures to ensure continued protection of humanhealth and the environment. Under this option, the owner or operator mustremove all liquid hazardous wastes and remove hazardous sludges to theextent practicable. The Agency believes that the significant reductionin the quantity of waste in the unit will reduce the threat posed by anyrelease to the environment. While some small amount of hazardous sludgesmay remain, the required removal activity significantly decreases the likelihoodthat a release of hazardous constituents, leached from the sludge at levelspresenting a threat to human health and the environment, will occur. To further ensure continued environmental protection, the Agency has retainedthe requirements it proposed to expedite the detection and remediationprocess. Units delaying closure will be required to receive permits andto operate under part 264 standards including ground-water monitoring standards.These units will therefore be subject to the same ground-water monitoringrequirements as units meeting all MTR. Further, to ensure prompt responseand remediation in the event of a release, accelerated corrective actionand/or closure of units is required. Surface impoundments not meeting liner and leachate collection systemsrequirements must submit a contingent corrective measures plan describinginterim measures for handling a release if it occurs and promptly implementthis plan if a release is detected. Detection of releases will be determinedusing either background levels or the ground-water protection standard(GWPS) if one has been established. Further, owners and operators willnot be allowed to delay implementation of corrective measures while a GWPSis being established. The Agency therefore continues to believe that the combination of wasteremoval and stricter detection and remediation requirements of andSection;andSection;264.113(e) and 265.113(e) will protect human health and the environmentand be consistent with the objectives and specific requirements of RCRA.Accordingly, the Agency is finalizing revised requirements in andSection;andSection;264.113(e) and 265.113(e) which allow surface impoundments not meetingliner and leachate collection system requirements to delay closure if hazardouswastes are first removed and other eligibility and operating criteria aremet. Section IV.B.2 discusses in more detail how the proposed requirementshave been modified in response to comments. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Landfills </ITAG>The proposed rule would allow landfills that meet the general requirementsset forth in andSection;andSection; 264.l13(d) and 265.113(d) to delay closure.One commenter opposed allowing landfills not meeting MTR to delay closure.The commenter contended that landfills not meeting MTR would pose risksof release similar to those posed by non-retrofitted surface impoundments.The Agency has considered the commenter's concerns, but is promulgatingthe final rule as proposed allowing landfills to delay closure if theymeet the requirements in andSection; 264.113(d). Existing landfills are notsubject to the provisions of Section 3005(j) of RCRA that require surfaceimpoundments to retrofit or cease receipt of hazardous waste by November8, 1988. Existing landfills are, however, subject to the requirements ofsection 3004(o) of RCRA. Under section 3004(o) existing landfills mustretrofit to meet MTR or cease receipt of hazardous waste only if they arelaterally expanded, or otherwise trigger the replacement or new unit definitions.The Agency believes that since existing landfills not satisfying MTR mayremain in operation to handle hazardous wastes, they should be allowedto delay closure to receive only non-hazardous wastes if they meet therequirements of andSection; 264.113(d) or andSection; 265.113(d), as applicable.The Agency also disagrees with the commenter's view of the risks presentedby receipt of non-hazardous waste at landfills. When evaluating a requestto delay closure of an existing landfill, the Agency will carefully considerthe compatibility of the hazardous and non-hazardous waste to be managedin the landfill in addition to all other requirements in andSection;andSection;264.113(d) and 265.113(d). Requiring landfills to comply with andSection;andSection;264.1I3(e) and 265.1l3(e) would result in units receiving only non-hazardouswastes being subject to more stringent requirements than landfills receivinghazardous wastes. Accordingly, under today's rule, landfills are subjectonly to the requirements in andSection;andSection; 264.113(d) and 265.113(d)to delay closure. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Land Treatment Units </ITAG>The proposed rule did not extend the option to delay closure to land treatmentunits. The Agency did, however, specifically request comment on whetherthe proposal should be extended to land treatment units. The majority of commenters on this issue supported extending the optionto delay closure to land treatment units. Comments favoring the optionpointed out that many land treatment facilities already manage both hazardousand non-hazardous waste streams. Commenters further asserted that landtreatment units pose a lower risk to ground water than surface impoundmentsand landfills because hazardous constituents are degraded and immobilizedas part of treatment, and that the destruction efficiency of a land treatmentunit may be improved when non-hazardous wastes are combined with hazardouswastes. One commenter who opposed allowing land treatment units to delayclosure stated that increased pressure and potential explosive and subsidencehazards could be caused by the acceptance of non-hazardous wastes. The Agency has considered these comments and has expanded the final ruleto allow land treatment units to delay closure if they satisfy the eligibilitycriteria of andSection;andSection; 264.113(d) and 265.113(d). The Agency believesthat land treatment units can delay closure and operate in a manner thatis protective of human health and the environment. All land treatment unitsthat delay closure will continue to be subject to all subtitle C requirementsfor land treatment units and the requirements of andSection;andSection; 264.113(d)and 265.113(d) of today's rule. Existing subtitle C regulations requireowners and operators of land treatment units to demonstrate that the hazardousconstituents in the subtitle C wastes will be completely degraded, transformedor immobilized in the treatment zone. As part of the permit or permit modification(or amended Part B application for interim status facilities) requiredto delay closure, these owners and operators will be required to demonstratethat receipt of non-hazardous waste will not inhibit the degradation, transformationor immobilization of the hazardous wastes in the treatment zone. Thesefactors, together with the other requirements of andSection;andSection; 264.113(d)and 265.113(d) will ensure that land treatment units delaying closure areadequately protective of human health and the environment.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Other Treatment and Storage Facilities </ITAG>The proposed rule would not allow storage units (i.e., storage and treatmenttanks, container storage areas, or waste piles) or incinerators to delayclosure. In the preamble to the proposal, the Agency stated that if theseunits wanted to delay closure in order to receive only non-hazardous waste,they would first be required to close in compliance with the requirementsof subpart G. The requirements for closure of these units involve removalor decontamination of all wastes and waste residues, containers, liners,bases and contaminated soils, equipment and other containment system components(40 CFR 264.178, 264.197, 264.258, 264.351, 265.197, and 265.351). Theseclosure requirements are not incompatible with the reuse of these unitsfor receipt of only non-hazardous waste. Once the unit has been emptiedof all hazardous wastes and decontaminated, it could receive non-hazardouswaste as a subtitle D facility, without being subject to the stricter provisionsof today's rule. Only one commenter recommended that tanks and container storage areas beallowed to delay closure. The Agency continues to believe that becausethe activities which would be necessary to delay closure are so similarto activities required to close these units, prohibiting storage unitsfrom delaying closure under today's rule will not impose an undue burdenon the owners and operators of these units. Therefore, the final rule ispromulgated as proposed and is not applicable to storage and treatmenttanks, container storage areas, waste piles and incinerators. B. Part 264 Standards The Agency proposed to amend andSection;andSection; 264.112(d) and 264.113(a), (b), and (c), and to add new paragraphs (d) and (e) to andSection; 264.113.Sections 264.113 (a) and (b) require a facility owner or operator to treat,dispose, or remove all hazardous wastes within 90 days and to completeclosure activities within 180 days of the final receipt of hazardous wastes.Further, andSection; 264.112(d) establishes that the date the owner or operatorexpects to begin closure, which triggers the notification requirements,is no later than 30 days after the receipt of the last known volume ofhazardous wastes. Under andSection;andSection; 264.113 (a) and (b) and 265.113(a) and (b), extensions to the closure period may be granted in certainlimited circumstances. Today's rule provides an additional justificationfor an extension of the closure period to allow for management of onlynon-hazardous wastes. Additionally, a conforming change is being made toandSection;andSection; 264.112(d) and 264.113(c) to address deadlines for closureof units that qualify to delay closure. The changes to andSection; 264.113being promulgated today supplement existing part 264 standards and provideassurance that public health and the environment will be adequately protectedat units delaying closure. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. General Conditions for Delay of Closure (andSection; 264.113 (d))</ITAG>Section 264.113(d) of today's rule establishes the general requirementsapplicable to all units delaying closure to receive non-hazardous wastesafter the final receipt of hazardous wastes. These requirements supplementexisting subtitle C requirements. The andSection; 264.113(d) requirementsare discussed in turn below. a. <T3>Demonstrations for Extensions to Closure Deadlines (andSection; 264.113(d)(1)).</T3>Section 264.113(d)(1) of the proposed rule required owners and operatorsof facilities wishing to delay closure to demonstrate as part of theirpermit application or modification that: (1) The unit(s) has adequate existingdesign capacity to continue to receive waste; (2) there is a reasonablelikelihood that non-hazardous wastes will be received in the unit withinone year of the final receipt of hazardous waste; (3) non-hazardous wastesreceived will be compatible with any other wastes remaining in the unit;(4) closure of the unit is incompatible with continued operation of thefacility; and (5) the facility will continue to be operated in compliancewith all applicable permit or interim status requirements.The Agency received a number of comments regarding these demonstrations.Most commenters recommended that the required demonstrations be modifiedor deleted from the final rule. The Agency continues to believe, however,that the demonstrations required in the proposal are necessary to ensurethat units delaying closure to receive only non-hazardous waste remainadequately protective of human health and the environment. In many cases,the required demonstrations are the same as those currently required underandSection;andSection; 264.113(b) and 265.113(b) for units wishing to temporarilysuspend hazardous waste management activities. The Agency's rationale forretaining each of the demonstrations is presented below. (1) <T3>Design Capacity.</T3> One commenter recommended that the option todelay closure not be restricted to a facility's original design capacity.The Agency continues to believe that it is prudent to restrict the optionto delay closure to the existing design capacity. In proposing these changesto the closure requirements, the Agency recognized that closure of a unitwhile the unit has remaining capacity to receive non-hazardous wastes coulddisrupt facility operations or impose substantial economic burdens on thefacility owner or operator. Where existing capacity can be utilized tomanage non-hazardous wastes in a manner that remains protective of humanhealth and the environment, extensions to the closure period may be allowed.The Agency believes that it is unwise to allow the expansion of subtitleC units for managing non-hazardous wastes, thus resulting in large unitssubject to subtitle C. Finally, the Agency does not believe that many ownersand operators would want to expand their subtitle C units or facilitiessimply to receive more non-hazardous waste, since such lateral expansionof surface impoundments and landfills would trigger the liner and leachatecollection system requirements of RCRA section 3004(o). The Agency recommendsthat if additional non-hazardous waste capacity is needed, a facility chooseto construct a unit designed to handle non-hazardous wastes in accordancewith Subtitle D requirements. (2) <T3>Receipt of Non-Hazardous Waste Within One Year.</T3> A commenter suggestedthat the required demonstration that wastes will be received within oneyear of the final receipt of hazardous waste be documented (e.g., throughsubmission of contracts indicating anticipated receipt of non-hazardouswaste) and that the time period within which non-hazardous wastes mustbe received should be shortened to three months. The Agency does not believethat such changes are necessary. The provision allowing a unit to remainopen if it receives additional wastes within one year of the final receiptof hazardous wastes is consistent with the provisions allowing continuedreceipt of hazardous waste. In implementing andSection;andSection; 264.112(d)(2)and 265.112(d)(2), the Agency currently determines on a case-by-case basisthe documentation that best supports the claim that additional wastes willbe received and that sufficient design capacity is remaining. In evaluatingthese submissions, the Regional Administrator generally takes into accounta number of factors including those suggested by the commenter, such as:(1) Unit or facility characteristics, including capacity and operatingconditions; (2) demand for the facility; (3) the owner or operator's businessplans; and (4) the history of facility operations (OSWER Policy Directiveandplusmin;9476.00-5, January 1987, pp. 3-16 and 3-17). Finally, the eligibilityrequirements, including the requirements to continue to comply with allpermit conditions or interim status standards, if applicable, will ensurethat units remaining open following the final receipt of hazardous wasteare protective of human health and the environment. (3) <T3>Compatibility of Wastes.</T3> The Agency received comments on the compatibilitydemonstration (andSection;andSection; 264.113(d)(1)(iv) and 265.113(d)(1)(iv))only with respect to landfill units. Several commenters challenged theAgency's suggestion in the preamble that it would be difficult to demonstratethat municipal solid wastes would be compatible with hazardous wastes remainingin landfill units, and therefore it would be unlikely that receipt of municipalsolid wastes would be allowed. The Agency continues to believe that, inmost cases, it will be difficult to demonstrate that municipal solid wasteswill be compatible with hazardous wastes remaining in a unit delaying closure.Problems which are anticipated include subsidence, settlement of the cap,or leachate and methane gas production. The Agency acknowledges, however,that some units have been specifically designed to co-manage both hazardousand municipal solid wastes. For these types of units, the Agency agreeswith the commenter that it may not be difficult to demonstrate that thecontinued receipt of non-hazardous wastes will be compatible with the designof the unit and with the hazardous wastes remaining in the unit. In caseswhere the unit has not been designed specifically to handle hazardous andnon-hazardous wastes, however, the Agency still believes that it will bedifficult to demonstrate that the addition of non-hazardous wastes willbe compatible with the remaining wastes in the unit and with the facilitydesign and operating requirements of part 264. The requirements of andSection;andSection;264.113(d)(1)(iv) and 265.113(d)(1)(iv) therefore remain unchanged. Theserequirements are applicable to all types of units eligible to delay closure.(4) <T3>Incompatibility of Closure With Continued Operations.</T3> A few commentersexpressed confusion about the requirement that owners and operators demonstratethat closure of the unit would be incompatible with continued operationof the facility.After considering the commenters' concerns, the Agency has decided to retainthe requirement that owners and operators of units delaying closure demonstratethat closure of the unit would be incompatible with continued operationof the facility (andSection; 264.113(d)(1)(iv)). This requirement is consistentwith existing requirements for requesting an extension to the deadlinesto begin closure for owners or operators wishing to receive additionalhazardous wastes, and has not proved to be an implementation concern todate. This demonstration can be supported by submission of informationshowing the role of the unit in the facility's overall waste managementscheme. The practical, rather than economic, disruptions which closureof the unit with remaining capacity would have on facility operations shouldbe evidenced. b. <T3>Continued Compliance With Subtitle C Requirements. </T3>A few commentersasserted that the Agency does not have the authority to require continuedcompliance with Subtitle C permitting requirements because units delayingclosure would be managing only non-hazardous wastes. One commenter recommendedthat the Agency not require compliance with both State and local regulationsin addition to Subtitle C requirements to avoid duplicate and potentiallyconflicting requirements. Finally, one commenter suggested that the Agencyclarify that surface impoundments not meeting liner and leachate collectionsystem requirements need not comply with the permit requirements for retrofitting.RCRA provides the Agency ample authority to regulate any units that receivedhazardous waste after November 19, 1980. Units wishing to delay closureare currently regulated under Subtitle C and remain regulated as long ashazardous constituents from those wastes remain in the units, unless theowner or operator obtains a delisting or satisfies clean closure requirements.In specifying in the preamble to the proposal that units comply with applicableState and local regulations, the Agency was merely restating existing requirements.Currently, an owner or operator is subject to all applicable State andlocal regulations in addition to applicable Federal requirements. Finally, one commenter pointed out that the requirement for surface impoundmentsnot designed to satisfy the MTR liner and leachate collection system requirementsto comply with all part 264 permit requirements could cause confusion.The Agency wishes to clarify that the MTR liner and leachate collectionrequirements are not applicable permit requirements for surface impoundmentsoperating under a andSection; 264.113(e) and andSection; 265.113(e) extension.It should be noted that lateral expansion of units delaying closure pursuantto andSection;andSection; 264.113(d) and (e) is not allowed. Lateral expansionof such units would trigger the MTR requirements of andSection; 3004(o) aswell as constitute a violation of today's regulation. c. <T3>Changes to Facility Plans (andSection; 264.113(d)(2)). </T3>Section 264.113(d)(2)proposed that owners and operators submit with their permit modificationrequest, necessary and appropriate changes to the waste analysis plan,ground-water monitoring plan and response plan, closure and post-closureplans and cost estimates, and demonstrations of financial assurance requiredelsewhere in part 264. These requirements parallel existing requirementsthat facility plans be revised to reflect substantial changes in the typesof hazardous wastes being handled or the hazardous waste management practicesemployed. Similarly, the Agency believes that to ensure proper managementof units receiving non-hazardous wastes, selected plans should be revisedto reflect changes in unit operations for managing only non-hazardous wastes.The Agency received very few comments on the proposed requirement to modifythe ground-water monitoring plan, closure and post-closure plans and costestimates, and financial assurance demonstrations (responses to these commentsappear in the Comment Response Document). However, a number of commentersobjected to the requirement to revise the waste analysis plan. One commenterstated that modifying the waste analysis plan is unnecessary because wastecompatibility already will have been demonstrated under the requirementsof andSection; 264.113(d)(1)(iii). In addition, this commenter stated thatthe Subtitle C waste analysis program cannot be adapted to municipal solidwastes because of the difficulty of obtaining the necessary data. UnderSubtitle C, generators of hazardous wastes must prepare a manifest identifyingthe contents of each shipment of waste. In contrast, generators of municipalsolid wastes are not required to compile the data necessary to characterizetheir wastes. Thus, municipalities and commercial trash collectors wouldbe unable to provide the TSDFs with data on the exact content of municipalsolid waste (generally household wastes) which would be necessary to complywith the waste analysis plan requirements. The Agency continues to believe that revision of the waste analysis planis necessary and practicable in most cases. Such information will be requiredto support the compatibility demonstration in andSection; 264.113(d)(1)(iii).The Agency would expect the compatibility demonstration required in andSection;264.113(d)(1)(iii) to cross-reference the waste analysis plan as evidencethat non-hazardous waste streams are compatible with previously managedhazardous wastes. It should be noted, however, that the final rule requires that the wasteanalysis plan be revised ``as necessary and appropriate'' to account forthe addition of additional or new non-hazardous waste streams. The Agencyacknowledges that in some cases the Subtitle C procedures for conductingphysical and chemical waste analyses and the requirements to prepare awaste analysis plan describing these procedures may be difficult to applyto municipal solid wastes. For example, generators of municipal trash (e.g.,households) do not have the data necessary to characterize the wastes.In such cases, the Agency may allow the owner or operator to use his ownknowledge about the waste streams to make the required compatibility demonstration(e.g., local ordinances that prohibit certain types of wastes from beingdisposed in the trash or visual inspections of truckloads). This flexibleapproach is consistent with current Agency practices. d. <T3>Exposure Assessment Information. </T3>Section 264.113(d)(4) of theproposed rule would have required owners and operators wishing to delayclosure to submit the human exposure assessment required under RCRA section3019(a) with the request to delay closure. This section further would haverequired that if the Regional Administrator determined that the unit poseda substantial risk to human health, then the unit would not be eligibleto delay closure. One commenter recommended that the Regional Administrator determine thatcontinued use of the unit to receive only nonhazardous waste would notpose a substantial risk to human health. Another commenter argued thatthe requirement was stated in excessively vague language and provided noopportunity for administrative appeal. Finally, a third commenter statedthat section 3019 information must be submitted only upon submission ofa final part B permit application, and that resubmission of the data shouldnot be a condition of delaying closure. The Agency has considered the commenters' recommendations and agrees thatresubmission of the human exposure assessment information required underRCRA section 3019(a) (40 CFR 270.10(j)) may not always be necessary todemonstrate that a unit can operate in a manner protective of human healthand the environment. The purpose of the information gathered under theauthority of RCRA section 3019 is to assist in the evaluation that a unitdelaying closure can continue to operate in a manner protective of humanhealth and the environment. Therefore, the Agency is modifying the finalrule to clarify that the information will only be required to be updated``as necessary and appropriate'' to account for the receipt of non-hazardouswastes following final receipt of hazardous wastes. The Agency is alsoincluding the requirement to submit or revise the andSection; 3019 informationwith the other plans and information updates required under andSection; 264.113(d)(2)rather than as a separate requirement in andSection; 264.113(d)(4). As aresult of this change, proposed andSection; 264.113(d)(4) has been deletedand andSection; 264.113(d)(5) has been renumbered andSection; 264.113(d)(3).e. <T3>Permit Revisions (andSection; 264.113(d)(4)). </T3>Under andSection; 264.113(d)(5),the proposed rule required that the permit modification include revisionsto the affected conditions of the permit, as appropriate, to account forthe management of only non-hazardous waste in the unit delaying closure.No comments were received on this section of the proposal and the Agencyis finalizing the requirement as proposed. Because of other changes tothe proposal that have resulted in a renumbering of some sections, thissection is being promulgated today as andSection; 264.113(d)(3). <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Additional Requirements for Surface Impoundments that do not MeetLiner and Leachate Collection System Requirements (andSection; 264.113(e))</ITAG>The Agency proposed under andSection; 264.113(e) additional requirementsapplicable to surface impoundments that do not meet MTR liner and leachatecollection system requirements. These additional requirements were establishedto ensure that these units are operated in a manner that is as protectiveof human health and the environment as surface impoundments in full compliancewith MTR. All surface impoundments not meeting MTR liner and leachate collectionsystem requirements must comply with the requirements of both andSection;264.113(d) and andSection; 264.113(e). Comments received on the proposedandSection; 264.113(e) requirements and the Agency's final position are discussedbelow. It must be noted that these units must continue to comply with section3005(j) which explicitly prohibits non-retrofitted surface impoundmentsfrom receiving hazardous wastes after the November 8, 1988 retrofit deadline.Receipt of some non-hazardous wastes also may not be permitted in theseunits. Certain non-hazardous liquids (e.g., electroplating wastewaters)generate a listed hazardous sludge. In a June 30, 1988, <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice clarifying the retrofitting requirements,the Agency stated that it interpreted the section 3005(j) requirement thatreceipt of hazardous waste cease after November 8, 1988 to mean ``thatno additional hazardous wastes or waste that generates a hazardous sludgeshall be placed in the unit (53 FR 24718).'' In order to remain in compliancewith section 3005(j), therefore, non-retrofitted surface impoundments delayingclosure under today's rule will not be permitted to receive a non-hazardouswaste if that waste generates a hazardous sludge. a. <T3>Contingent Corrective Measures Plan (andSection; 264.113(e)(1)). </T3>Inaddition to the demonstrations and requirements described in IV.B.1 above,the Agency proposed to require owners or operators of surface impoundmentsthat do not satisfy liner and leachate collection system requirements toinclude a contingent corrective measures plan with the request to modifythe permit as a condition of delaying closure, unless a corrective actionplan has already been submitted. The purpose of the plan is to ensure thatcorrective action can be implemented quickly if a release is detected.Since the exact extent and type of release will not be known, the contingentcorrective measures plan should describe a range of possible remedies forlikely release scenarios. The preparation of this plan does not relievethe owner or operator from any existing or future requirements of a correctiveaction program or schedules of compliance in a RCRA section 3008(h) correctiveaction order or any other order incorporating corrective action requirements.The Agency received only three comments on this requirement. One commenterstated that the requirement is ``overly burdensome'' and duplicative ofcorrective action provisions in andSection; 264.100, and indicated that sincefacilities delaying closure will still be subject to the permitting process,a separate mechanism for implementing corrective action is not necessary.A second commenter argued that the amount of detail required for the planis beyond what could reasonably be known prior to actually having a release.Another commenter questioned whether the corrective measures plan wouldinclude ``meaningful corrective measures.'' The Agency is finalizing the requirement of andSection; 264.113(e)(1)(i)for the contingent corrective measures plan as proposed because of theimportance of ensuring that surface impoundments not meeting liner andleachate collection system standards continue to be managed in a mannermost protective of human health and the environment. Requiring a contingentcorrective measures plan in advance of a detection of a release will ensureprompt implementation of remedial measures to prevent further contamination,contain any existing contamination, and remediate contaminated ground water.In general, the Agency believes that this plan can readily be preparedusing the data submitted as part of the Part B application (e.g., typesof constituents at the facility, hydrogeologic conditions, location ofground-water monitoring wells, and available remedial technologies). Infact, some States already require a contingent corrective measures plan.Further, the Agency believes that the measures required in the contingentcorrective measures plan will be ``meaningful'' and timely. The Agencybelieves that it is practical to anticipate many of the actions that maybe necessary to remediate releases to ground water. The measures outlinedin the contingent corrective measures plan will often be the same typesof measures required under the full corrective action plan. Among the measuresdiscussed by the Agency in the preamble to the proposed rule that mightbe included in the plan were extrapolation of future contaminant movement,a discussion of the likely contaminants of concern, and a description ofmeasures that can be installed quickly to address releases of differenttypes of constituents or releases at variable rates, and plumes of differentsize and depth. In many cases these actions will constitute interim measures,such as alternate water supplies, stabilization and repair of side walls,dikes, and liners, or reduction of head. Such interim measures would preventand contain releases and complement any longer-term corrective measuresthat may be required following a detailed evaluation. The plan should alsodescribe in detail the range of corrective measures that might be used,including the equipment and physical components required. Finally, the owner or operator must address whether continued receipt ofwastes would impede the progress of corrective action and establish criteriaor milestones to ensure that substantial progress in remediating the releaseis achieved. As discussed further in section IV.B.2.c.3 of today's preamble,the owner or operator of a non-retrofitted surface impoundment must ceasethe receipt of waste upon detection of release unless he has an approvedcontingent corrective measures plan which demonstrates that continued wastereceipt will not impede the progress of the required corrective measures.b. <T3>Alternatives.</T3> Today's final rule requires owners or operatorsof surface impoundments that do not meet liner and leachate collectionsystem requirements to remove all hazardous liquids and sludges to theextent practicable as a precondition of delaying closure to receive non-hazardouswastes. As part of the demonstrations required in the request to delayclosure, an owner or operator must include a plan for complying with thiswaste removal requirement. Two alternatives originally proposed have notbeen finalized. The following section summarizes the comments receivedon the alternatives and describes the Agency's final position. (1) <T3>Alternative 1_Removal of Hazardous Wastes (andSection; 264.113(e)(2)).</T3>The proposal offered owners and operators, as a primary alternative,the option to remove all hazardous liquids and sludges from the surfaceimpoundment prior to receipt of non-hazardous waste. This option appearsin today's final rule as Section 264.113(e)(2). This section discussescomments received on this option, as well as the applicability of the mixturerule to impoundments removing hazardous wastes. (a) <T3>Liquid and sludge removal. </T3>Under the first alternative, proposedas andSection; 264.113(e)(2)(i), the Agency proposed that an owner or operatorof a surface impoundment remove all hazardous liquids and hazardous sludges,to the extent practicable without damaging the liner, from the impoundmentprior to the receipt of non-hazardous waste.\1\<NOTE/> In the preamble, the Agency noted that for unlined units(i.e., units with natural clay liners), the hazardous wastes must be removeddown to the underlying and adjacent soil. In addition, the proposal specifiedthat, in the event of a release to ground water, the facility would haveto comply with the corrective action requirements of proposed andSection;264.113(e)(5) and discussed in section IV.B.2.c below.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The draft RCRA Guidance Document, ``Minimum TechnologyGuidance on Single Liner Systems for Landfills, Surface Impoundments andWaste Piles, Design, Construction and Operation,'' issued May 24, 1985,for example, suggests that a minimum of 18 inches of protective soil orequivalent is appropriate to protect liners from damage when mechanicalequipment is used to remove sludge or contents of the impoundments.The Agency also proposed that owners or operators choosing this alternativeremove hazardous wastes (liquid and sludges) no later than 90 days afterthe final receipt of hazardous waste. The proposal allowed the RegionalAdministrator to approve a request for a longer period of time based onneed (e.g., due to adverse weather conditions or specific operating practices),and on a demonstration that an extension would not pose a threat to humanhealth and the environment. The deadline and criteria for requesting anextension to the 90-day deadline in the proposal were consistent with thecurrent provisions in andSection; 264.113(a) for removing all hazardous wastesat closure and for requesting an extension to that deadline. The Agency received one comment on this proposed alternative requestingclarification of whether natural clay-lined units should remove the clayliners along with the sludge. The requirement to remove sludge from unlinedunits ``down to the underlying and adjacent soil'' excludes the liner innaturally-clay lined units. Removal need only be completed to the clay.This clarification does not affect the amount of materials that may berequired to be removed from the unit at the time of final closure. No othercomments were received and the provision is finalized as proposed. (b) <T3>Relationship to the mixture rule. </T3>In the preamble to the proposedrule, the Agency discussed the applicability of the ``mixture rule'' inthe context of owners or operators who treat wastes in a series of surfaceimpoundments. In that discussion, the Agency stated that in most cases,the mixture rule would not apply because mixing of hazardous sludge withnon-hazardous influent would be unlikely. Therefore, a non-retrofittedsurface impoundment delaying closure under the proposed rule could dischargeinto a non-retrofitted downstream surface impoundment, because the dischargedwastes would not be considered hazardous. The Agency received several commentson this interpretation of the ``mixture rule.'' (53 FR 20750) While severalcommenters supported the Agency's interpretation, other commenters arguedthat this position is inconsistent with previous Agency interpretations.The commenters who disagreed stated that when a non-hazardous waste anda listed hazardous waste are co-mingled and co-managed in the same unitunder any circumstances, the entire mixture is considered a listed hazardouswaste and must be managed appropriately. The Agency maintains that the discussion of the mixture rule containedin the preamble to the proposal is consistent with previous Agency actions.The Agency has consistently interpreted the mixture rule <T3>not</T3> to apply where a non-listed waste is discharged to a unit(i.e., surface impoundment) even if that liquid generates a hazardous sludge,unless the sludge is in some way ``mixed'' with the liquid (e.g., scouredas a result of operations in the unit). If the Agency did not interpretthe mixture rule in this manner, there would be no point in carefully limitinglistings to include sludges but exclude wastewaters. The alternate mixturerule interpretation suggested by several commenters would make the wastewaterhazardous as soon as the listed sludge was generated. EPA believes that the opportunity for mixing of hazardous sludges and hazardousliquids from impoundments where all hazardous liquids and sludges havebeen removed to the extent practicable as required by andSection;andSection;264.113(e)(2) and 265.113(e)(2) will be minimal. Opportunities for mixingwill be further diminished as additional non-hazardous sludge is generated.Were any mixing to occur, it would be confined to the liquid/sludge interface.Levels of hazardous constituents escaping from the hazardous sludge tothe non-hazardous liquid are not likely to pose an appreciable risk tohuman health and the environment. Should the impoundment be subsequentlydredged so that scouring or other physical mixing occurs, the mixture rulewould come into effect. (This rationale is discussed further in 46 FR 56582,November 17, 1981).Once all hazardous liquids and hazardous sludges have been removed to theextent practicable, free liquids from such impoundments may be dischargedto non-MTR units because the liquids would not be considered to be hazardouswastes. Additionally, as discussed earlier, to remain in compliance withsection 3005(j), non-retrofitted impoundments wishing to delay closuremay not receive a non-hazardous waste that generates a hazardous wasteor sludge. (2) <T3>Alternative 2_Flushing Hazardous Wastes.</T3> The proposal offeredowners or operators the second option of flushing or displacing liquidhazardous wastes and removing hazardous sludges. For reasons discussedbelow, the Agency is not finalizing this alternative. The proposed ``flushing'' alternative (proposed andSection; 264.113(e)(2)(ii))would have allowed an owner or operator to delay closure of a surface impoundmentsubject to andSection; 264.113(e) if he removed the hazardous sludges andalso removed the liquid hazardous waste and suspended solids by flushingthe unit with non-hazardous influent until 95 percent of the hazardousliquid had been removed. In addition, the owner or operator would havebeen required to demonstrate that the remaining liquid waste and suspendedsolids did not exhibit a characteristic of hazardous wastes as definedin subpart C of part 261. Testing for listed hazardous constituents, however,was not required. The Agency intended this alternative to apply primarilyto owners or operators of biological treatment impoundments who demonstratedthat it would be infeasible or impracticable to drain the impoundment toremove all hazardous wastes. Comments received on this alternative were varied. Several commenters arguedthat the displacement alternative was inappropriate for impoundments containinglisted hazardous wastes and recommended removal of hazardous wastes toat least delisting levels. Other commenters asserted that the Agency wasimproperly allowing for dilution of hazardous wastes as a substitute foradequate treatment. Commenters in favor of the displacement alternativestated that the alternative is a reasonable standard and would eventuallyresult in the removal of all hazardous waste in the unit. The Agency is concerned that many commenters misunderstood the flushingalternative, particularly the relationship of the 95 percent volume displacementrequirements and the requirements for delisting of hazardous wastes (40CFR 260.22). The Agency may have contributed to this confusion by referringto testing for characteristics only and by describing the mixture ruleonly in terms of the interface between the non-hazardous influent and thesludge remaining in the bottom of the impoundment. If the liquid itselfis a listed hazardous waste, the remaining 5 percent volume of that liquidwould continue to be hazardous waste. Therefore, if an impoundment retained5 percent liquid hazardous wastes, all new non-hazardous influent wouldbecome hazardous wastes as a result of the ``mixture rule,'' unless theoriginal hazardous waste was listed solely because it exhibited one ormore characteristics and the mixture no longer exhibited the characteristic(40 CFR 261.3). Therefore, while the impoundment that removed 95 percentof its liquid could delay closure without retrofitting, if it dischargedto another impoundment downstream, the second impoundment would be receivinghazardous wastes and would therefore be subject to the retrofit requirementsin RCRA section 3005(j). Furthermore, in light of the commenters' concerns, the Agency has decidedto re-evaluate this option. The Agency is uncertain that the option todelay closure is warranted for any impoundment that retains up to 5 percentliquid hazardous waste. For the reasons discussed above and in sectionIV.A.1 of this preamble, the Agency has decided to delete this option fromthe final rule. The Agency points out, however, that owners and operatorswho remove all liquids under Alternative 1 may use flushing as a removalmethod. The owner or operator would have to demonstrate the complete removalof hazardous liquids. Tracer studies as described in the proposed Alternative2 (53 FR 20750), or modeling studies may be used. (3) <T3>Alternative 3_Leaving Hazardous Wastes In Place.</T3> The third alternativeproposed in andSection; 264.113(e)(3) would have allowed owners or operatorsof impoundments who intend to leave hazardous wastes in place at closureto delay closure under limited circumstances. This option also has notbeen finalized in today's rule. Because hazardous wastes would not havebeen removed prior to the receipt of non-hazardous wastes, the Agency proposedmore stringent requirements for these impoundments than for impoundmentsat which hazardous wastes would have been removed. This alternative wouldhave been available only to those units that had not detected a releaseat or prior to the final receipt of hazardous wastes. In addition, if arelease had been detected after the final receipt of hazardous wastes,the owner or operator would have been required to initiate closure of thedisposal impoundment in accordance with the approved closure plan no laterthan 30 days after the detection of the release and implement the correctivemeasures specified in the contingent corrective measures plan no laterthan one year after the release had been detected.One commenter recommended that impoundments which have not removed hazardouswastes (impoundments using proposed Alternative 3) not be allowed to delayclosure. This commenter felt that these impoundments are more likely toleak and would pose an excessive threat to human health and the environment.As discussed in section IV.A.1 above, the Agency is not finalizing thisalternative. Upon reconsideration, the Agency has determined that surfaceimpoundments from which hazardous wastes are not removed present a greaterthreat of release of hazardous constituents. Therefore, these impoundmentscannot remain open to receive non-hazardous waste and achieve the Agency'sdual goals of release prevention and protection of human health and theenvironment. The Agency believes that only the closure of these surfaceimpoundments will provide adequate protection. c. <T3>Corrective Action Requirements (andSection;andSection; 264.113(e) (4) and(5)). </T3>Under the proposed rule, units that delayed closure would remainsubject to all applicable part 264 corrective action requirements. In addition,surface impoundments not meeting the liner and leachate collection systemrequirements would be subject to more stringent requirements in the eventof a release. The following section summarizes the comments received andthe Agency's final position on the proposed trigger for corrective action,reliance on ground-water monitoring data to detect releases, and additionalcorrective action requirements applicable to surface impoundments not meetingliner and leachate collection system requirements. (1) <T3>Corrective Action Trigger (andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(4)). </T3>TheAgency proposed in andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(5), (6), (7), and (8)that surface impoundments not meeting liner and leachate collection systemrequirements implement corrective measures (and close, if wastes have beenleft in place) if contamination is detected. Detection occurs when thereis contamination that is statistically greater than (or less than in thecase of pH) background levels for detection monitoring parameters or hazardousconstituents specified in the permit, or is in excess of the GWPS, if onehas been established, at the point of compliance. (For more informationon the Agency's final Ground-Water Monitoring Statistical Rule, see October11, 1988, 53 FR 39720.) A number of commenters disagreed with these requirements and argued thatfacilities should be allowed to establish a GWPS before corrective measuresare required to be implemented. These commenters contended that the proposedtrigger for corrective action (and closure for impoundments that have leftwaste in place) would be too sensitive and that temporary fluctuationsin the levels of hazardous constituents would trigger unnecessary correctiveaction (or closure). One commenter requested clarification of the mannerin which a background level would be established. After consideration of the commenters' recommendations, the Agency hasdecided to retain the corrective action trigger as originally proposed.(Because the Agency is not finalizing proposed Alternative 3, the correctiveaction trigger no longer acts as a closure trigger for surface impoundmentsthat have not removed hazardous wastes as a condition of delaying closure.)However, because the corrective action requirements have been modifiedsomewhat (see section IV.B.2.c.3), these requirements have been renumberedand promulgated in andSection; 264.113(e)(4). The Agency believes that the trigger for corrective action is a necessaryelement of today's regulations. The delayed closure regulations will allownon-retrofitted surface impoundments to remain open after November 8, 1988(as well as those surface impoundments which become subject to section3005(j)(1) after the date of enactment of HSWA due to the promulgationof additional listings or characteristics for the identification of hazardouswaste under section 3001), and the requirements must therefore providesufficient continued protection of health and the environment. The Agencyhas provided for this protection through strict eligibility and operatingcriteria and more stringent corrective measures provisions, including requirementsfor the submission of a contingent corrective measures plan and implementationof corrective action if a release over background levels is detected atunits without a GWPS. The Agency does not believe that allowing units without a GWPS to obtainone before requiring corrective action will provide adequate protectionsince a delay in remediation of a release that might occur if correctivemeasures were not implemented until after a GWPS was obtained could posean additional threat. Modeling data comparing the relative performanceof clay liners and synthetic liners satisfying the liner and leachate collectionsystem requirements suggest that a non-retrofitted surface impoundmentmay have releases that are faster and larger than from a surface impoundmentmeeting the liner and leachate collection system requirements. Therefore,it is critical that releases from units not meeting liner and leachatecollection system requirements be addressed as quickly as possible. Therequirements for a contingent corrective measures plan combined with themore sensitive trigger will ensure prompt release containment and remediation.It should be noted, however, that an owner or operator who has filed aPart B permit application may request a GWPS at any time before or aftercorrective measures have been initiated. A facility may request and obtaina GWPS in advance of a release during the permit approval process, or atthe time that the release is detected. The Regional Administrator, in andSection;264.91(b), has the authority to include in the facility permit a combinationof subpart F monitoring and response programs in order to protect humanhealth and the environment. This provision gives the Regional Administratorthe discretion to set a GWPS before a release has occurred. The GWPS canbe established at background or maximum contaminant levels, or at alternateconcentration limits on a case-by-case basis. Alternate concentration limitsset at acceptable health exposure levels using Agency values should notbe difficult to establish prior to a release being detected. If no GWPS has been established, the Agency will continue to require thatinitial corrective measures be implemented in accordance with the contingentcorrective measures plan after a release over background levels is detected.Background levels are to be determined as described in andSection;andSection;264.97 and 265.91. The Agency recognizes that in some circumstances a releaseover background levels may not require extensive corrective measures. Ifa GWPS is established in accordance with the procedures in andSection; 264.94during or after interim measures have been implemented, an owner or operatorwill be allowed to demonstrate that no further corrective action measuresare necessary. Finally, it is noted that these requirements are anticipatedto be consistent with forthcoming changes to 40 CFR subpart F. The delayedclosure provisions may be amended at a later date to account for thesenew subpart F provisions.(2) <T3>Other Media.</T3> The proposed rule required that EPA base the initialdetermination of whether expedited corrective action is required at surfaceimpoundments subject to the requirements of andSection; 264.113(e) on ground-watermonitoring data. The unit, however, would remain subject to all correctiveaction requirements for all media. The Agency requested comments on thisapproach and whether other options may be appropriate. One commenter agreed with the proposal and noted that it is consistentwith the Agency's approach to all regulated land disposal units. Furthermore,the use of ground-water monitoring data should be adequate to detect mostreleases to other media. Another commenter, however, asserted that relianceon ground-water monitoring alone is inadequate because results may be affectedby poorly placed wells and local hydrologic conditions that control plumemigration. This commenter also felt that contamination to media other thanground water may not be expeditiously detected. The Agency continues to believe that ground-water monitoring is an adequatetool for determining whether the accelerated corrective action requirementsof today's rule are necessary for releases to ground water. The provisionof andSection; 264.113(e)(5) and (6) has been finalized as proposed. Ground-watermonitoring has been traditionally and successfully used to monitor contaminantdetection and plume migration. Forthcoming corrective action regulationswill address releases to all other media. The provisions in today's rulesupplement existing and any future regulation addressing corrective actionrequirements for all media. (3) <T3>Additional Corrective Measures Requirements.</T3> The Agency's proposalincluded additional corrective measures requirements that would apply tosurface impoundments not meeting liner and leachate collection system requirementsand which have removed (or will remove) hazardous waste in order to delayclosure. The proposed requirements differed, depending on whether a releasehad been detected before or after the final receipt of hazardous wastes.Under the proposal, units found to be leaking at or prior to the finalreceipt of hazardous wastes would be required to cease the receipt of allwastes until corrective measures have been implemented (andSection; 264.113(a)(5)and (6)). Units found to be leaking after the final receipt of hazardouswaste could continue to receive non-hazardous waste only if correctivemeasures were implemented within one year of the detection of a release,and if continued receipt of the non-hazardous waste would not pose a threatto human health or the environment (andSection; 264.113(e)(7)). The Agencyrequested comments on whether the requirements should differ dependingon the timing of the release, and on the one-year deadline for implementingthe corrective measures. Some argued that the Agency provided no justification for imposing stricterrequirements on owners or operators who detected a release at or priorto the final receipt of hazardous waste. Others contended that ceasingreceipt of waste until corrective measures are implemented would be undulydisruptive to facility operations. Nearly all comments on this issue recommendedthat the same corrective action requirements apply in cases of releasesdetected before and after the final receipt of hazardous waste. Two commentersrecommended that all surface impoundments with releases, regardless ofwhen the releases were detected, be required to cease the receipt of wastesuntil corrective measures are implemented. Another commenter recommendedthat the Regional Administrator be allowed to grant one-year extensionsto the proposed deadline for implementing corrective measures on a case-by-casebasis. The Agency has carefully considered the commenters' suggestions, and hasdecided to modify the requirements applicable to the continued receiptof wastes after the detection of a release. The final rule under andSection;264.113(e)(5) allows the owner or operator to continue to receive wastesafter detection of a release, regardless of when the release is detected,only in those cases where a contingent corrective measures plan (or fullcorrective action plan) has been approved. In addition to a descriptionof the corrective measures to be implemented, if receipt of wastes is tocontinue, the plan must fully account for the impact of receipt of non-hazardouswastes on corrective measures by demonstrating that continued receipt ofwastes will not adversely affect the implementation of corrective measuresand the achievement of substantial progress in achieving the facility'sGWPS. The Agency believes that these effects must be considered beforereceipt of non-hazardous wastes is allowed. Once EPA has approved the contingentcorrective measures plan that demonstrates that continued receipt of non-hazardouswaste will not adversely affect the progress of the corrective action,receipt of non-hazardous wastes may resume. As stated in the preamble to the proposed rule, the Agency continues tobelieve that temporarily ceasing receipt of wastes until corrective measureshave been implemented should not be overly disruptive to facility ownersor operators. Many units will have already triggered compliance monitoringand/or be engaged in corrective action under Subpart F. Therefore, in thosecases where waste receipt must be halted, there should not be an extensivedelay in implementing corrective action and allowing the unit to resumereceipt of wastes. The Agency also anticipates that since these units havedetected releases, they will receive priority in obtaining approval forcorrective action plans.The Agency is finalizing the one-year deadline for implementing correctivemeasures under andSection; 264.113(e)(4) as proposed. The Agency believesone year from the time of release detection or plan approval whicheveris later, is sufficient time to begin implementing corrective measures.As discussed in the preamble to the proposed rule (53 FR 20752), the Agencyintends that actual containment or remediation measures be implementedwithin one year. The actions required to be accomplished within this oneyear will be negotiated during the corrective measures approval process.In addition, the Regional Administrator has the option to require implementationof corrective measures earlier than one year after a release is detectedif necessary for the protection of human health and the environment. Establishedprocedures for adjusting such permit schedules of compliance will be available.Therefore, specific authority to allow the Regional Administrator to grantextensions is unnecessary and could lead to unacceptable delays in closinga unit should the owner or operator fail to take timely action to initiatethe implementation of remedial action. d. <T3>Evaluating the Progress of Corrective Action (andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(5), (6), and (7)). </T3>The proposed rule required owners or operatorsto demonstrate ``substantial progress'' in implementing corrective actionand achieving the facilities' GWPS or background level if the facilityhas not yet established a GWPS. If the Regional Administrator determinedthat an owner or operator had failed to make substantial progress in implementingthe required corrective measures, the owner or operator would be requiredto initiate closure of the leaking unit (andSection; 264.113(e)(10)). Theproposed rule did not define ``substantial progress'' because the Agencybelieved that the determination should be made on a case-by-case basis.In the preamble to the proposal, however, the Agency did provide examplesof situations that illustrated a failure to make substantial progress.Examples included failure to comply with the requirements of section (e)(5)for implementing corrective measures within one year or subsequent failureto comply with significant deadlines in the approved corrective measuresplan, schedule of compliance, the permit, or other enforcement orders establishingtimeframes for achieving the facility's GWPS. The Agency also specifiedthat semi-annual corrective action progress reports required under andSection;264.113(e)(9) would be considered in making the determination, but thatcompliance with only these procedural or reporting requirements would notalone constitute substantial progress. The proposed rule also established an accelerated set of procedures forinitiating closure under andSection; 264.113(e)(11). The procedures includednotification of the owner or operator, public notice of the decision, anda 20-day comment period. These proposed procedures did not allow administrativeappeals of final decisions regarding closure. Several commenters expressed concern that the term ``substantial progress''was too vague and subjective. One commenter felt that hearings should beallowed to determine whether substantial progress has been made. Anothercommenter recommended that the Agency allow administrative appeals of decisionsto require closure. The Agency has considered the commenters' recommendations, but continuesto believe that a specific definition of ``substantial progress'' is bothunnecessary and undesirable. Establishing a rigid standard of substantialprogress would prevent a Regional Administrator from considering site-specificfactors in the determination of whether progress in corrective action isbeing made. Because corrective action measures are tailored to specificsites, this lack of flexibility could result in a standard that in somecases is inadequately protective of human health and the environment, andin other cases is unnecessarily burdensome to owners and operators. TheAgency believes that its description of actions considered to constitutesubstantial progress provides adequate guidance to both owners and operatorsand Regional Administrators. EPA notes that, while commenters were dissatisfiedthat a definition of substantial progress was not included in the rule,they did not suggest alternative definitions. Therefore, the Agency isfinalizing the rule as proposed (with the reporting requirement and substantialprogress requirement renumbered as andSection; 264.113(e) (5) and (6)) .Finally, the Agency has retained the expedited procedural requirementsin andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(11) and 265.113(e)(11) for determiningwhether substantial progress has been achieved (renumbered as andSection;andSection;264.113(e)(7) and 265.113(e)(7) for the final rule). The Agency continuesto believe that these procedures afford owners and operators adequate protectionof any due process rights and that hearing and administrative appeals areneither appropriate nor required. The objective of the procedures is toreduce delays in initiating closure, while still providing owners and operatorsand the public with notice and comment opportunities. As discussed elsewherein today's preamble, the requirement to implement effective correctivemeasures in the event a release is detected is an essential component ofthe controls imposed on surface impoundments not meeting the liner andleachate collection system requirements. EPA believes that the harm potentiallycaused to human health and the environment by impoundments unable to promptlyremediate releases outweighs any potential burdens imposed on owners andoperators. Furthermore, it must be remembered that owners and operatorsare not authorized generally under this rule to delay closure; rather theauthorization to delay closure is an exception to the general Subpart Grequirements and is expressly conditioned upon meeting the substantialprogress demonstration when and if applicable. Although this provisionis itself self-implementing and need not be accompanied by further noticeand comment opportunities, the Agency has afforded such an opportunitythrough the procedures in andSection;andSection; 264.113(e)(7) and 265.113(e)(7).The further delay that might result from a hearing provision or administrativeappeals cannot be justified in light of the importance of timely responseactions. Nor would such additional procedures be likely to present anyinformation for decisionmaking that could not be provided by notice andthe opportunity to provide written comment. In addition, with respect to permitted facilities, receipt of approvalfor this action and establishment of specific milestones defining ``substantialprogress'' are determined through a permit issuance or modification process.This administrative process includes all procedural protections necessaryto meet statutory and Constitutional requirements. Thus, a conditionalauthorization to delay closure as a permit provision and the automaticexpiration for failure to comply with the permit requirement to make substantialprogress in remediating releases will have already been subject to noticeand opportunities for comment and administrative appeals. Accordingly,further process is unnecessary.To provide analogous procedural protections for facilities which may stillbe in interim status at the time of the Regional Administrator's determination,parallel procedures appear in andSection; 265.113(e)(7). As with permittedfacilities, the conditional authorization to delay closure is also accompaniedby an opportunity for notice and comment. This occurs through the proceduresfor closure plan approval or modification in andSection; 265.112(d). Accordingly,further procedures such as hearings and administrative appeals are notnecessary and have not been added to the final rule. 3. <T3>Notification of Closure (andSection; 264.112(d)(2)).</T3>  The proposedrule amended andSection; 264.112(d)(2) to specify that for units delayingclosure, the ``expected date of closure'' is no later than 30 days afterthe final receipt of non-hazardous wastes. No comments were received onthis proposed change, and therefore the final rule is promulgated as proposed.C. <T3>Part 270 Permit Modification Requirements (andSection; 270.42).</T3>The proposed rule designated the request to modify the permit to delayclosure to receive non-hazardous wastes after the final receipt of hazardouswaste as a Class 2 modification, in accordance with the recently finalizedrule establishing three classes of permit modifications (September 28,1988, 53 FR 37912). Two commenters recommended that permit modifications to delay closure beconsidered Class 3 modifications rather than Class 2 modifications. Onecommenter felt that the time allowed for submitting the request to modifythe permit under andSection; 264.113(d), or for submitting a part B or revisedpart B application under andSection; 265.113(d), is unrealistically shortconsidering the amount of information to be included in the requests. Anothercommenter suggested that specific criteria be identified as necessary tosupport a Regional Administrator's denial of a request to delay closure.Another commenter recommended that time be allowed for a facility to constructan alternative waste management unit for closure if the Regional Administratordenies the request to delay closure. Finally, one commenter suggested thatan owner or operator be allowed to receive non-hazardous waste during thetime the permit modification is being reviewed. The Agency has taken these comments into consideration but has decidedto promulgate the final rule as proposed. Class 2 modifications are definedas modifications in the types and quantities of waste managed under thefacility permit, including authorizations to treat or store new wastesthat do not require different unit design or management practices (53 FR37915). Delaying closure to receive only non-hazardous waste does not changethe basic purpose and use of the unit but only alters the type of wastebeing managed (wastes will continue to be regulated under the subtitleC permitting requirements). Furthermore, the Class 2 modification allowsthe Agency to require that the major permit modification procedures befollowed if the proposed change raises significant interest or concern(40 CFR 270.42(b)). Therefore, the Agency believes that classificationof the permit modification as Class 2 is adequate. It should be noted that,in those States which have not adopted the new permit modification classificationrule, a permit modification to delay closure will be considered a majormodification. The Agency also believes that the amount of time allowed in the proposedrule (andSection; 264.113(d)(3)) for submitting permit modification informationis adequate. These timeframes are consistent with the current timeframesfor submitting permitting and closure plan information (40 CFR 270.42(b)).In addition, most changes that must be made to the permit or permit applicationare not substantial and therefore should not require additional time tocomplete. The Agency does not believe that specific criteria need to be establishedto support the Regional Administrator's decision to deny a request to delayclosure. Therefore, no changes to the final rule have been made. As discussedin section IV.B.2.d of today's preamble, the requirement to close in accordancewith an approved closure plan is subject to judicial review. Additionally,facilities must submit an amended part B application or a request for apermit modification. The denial of either is subject to the administrativerequirements provided for in 40 CFR Part 124. Finally, for interim statusfacilities, the extension of the closure period is generally processedtogether with closure plan approval. The closure plan approval processincludes an opportunity for comment by the owner or operator (see andSection;264.112(a)). Such existing procedures provide the owner or operator withample opportunity to review the basis for the denial decision. Furthermore, the Agency does not believe that additional time should beallowed to construct alternative units to handle wastes if the requestto delay closure is denied. (The delay of closure option is an exceptionto general closure requirements and extends closure timeframes only temporarily.)Owners and operators of facilities will have had adequate notice that theirunits will have to close, and therefore will have had time to plan alternativesin the event that the permit modification is denied. Finally, the Agency wishes to clarify that non-hazardous waste may be receivedduring the time when a permitted facility's permit modification to delayclosure is under review. As discussed in the preamble to the proposed rule,interim status units would be allowed to receive non-hazardous waste whilethe Agency reviewed the part B application (with certain exceptions forsurface impoundments as discussed in section IV.B.2.c). Similarly, it wasintended that permitted facilities that are awaiting the Agency's decisionon their permit modification to delay closure be allowed to receive non-hazardouswaste during this period of Agency review. In either case, facilities mustcontinue to comply with all applicable subtitle C requirements to ensurecontinued protection of human health and the environment. D. Conforming Changes The Agency proposed conforming changes to the interim status standardsin part 265 that parallel the technical requirements in part 264 for delayingclosure to receive only non-hazardous waste. The interim status requirementsare substantially the same as those for permitted units. These requirementshave been finalized incorporating changes parallel to those discussed abovefor permitted units. This section addresses only those comments or regulatorychanges unique to the part 265 requirements. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Conforming Changes to Part 265 Interim Status Requirements </ITAG>The sections below describe comments received on the proposed conformingchanges to part 265 interim status requirements, including eligibilityof interim status facilities to delay closure, ground-water monitoringand corrective action implementation, and eligibility to delay closureof units receiving interim status as a result of new regulations.a. <T3>Eligibility.</T3> The proposed rule would allow owners or operatorsof interim status facilities to remain open to receive nonhazardous wasteif they meet the requirements of andSection; 265.113 (d) and (e), if applicable,including submission of a part B application or a revised part B application.Part B applications are required because the Agency does not believe thata facility should be allowed to remain open to receive non-hazardous wastewhile remaining indefinitely in interim status. During the period priorto receipt of the permit, the owner or operator must comply with applicablerequirements in andSection; 265.113 (d) and (e), if applicable, and continueto conduct operations in accordance with all other applicable part 265requirements. The Agency believes that the criteria in andSection; 265.113(d),combined with the technical and any other requirements of part 265 fordelaying closure, are sufficient to preclude any increased threat to humanhealth and the environment during the permit review period. If the permitis denied, the part 265 closure requirements become effective immediately.One commenter requested clarification of whether interim status surfaceimpoundments that had chosen to close (in lieu of obtaining a permit) wouldbe allowed to delay closure. The Agency would allow such units to delayclosure if they meet the criteria of andSection;andSection; 265.113(d) and265.113(e), if applicable, including submission of a part B permit application.If the unit is in the process of closing, Agency approval to delay closurewould depend on how far along the unit is in the closure process. Sincemany of the closure activities (e.g., the removal of waste) are compatiblewith the requirements for delaying closure, requests to delay closure could,in some cases be considered. If the surface impoundment has certified cleanclosure, and its interim status is subsequently terminated, it could receivenon-hazardous waste as a Subtitle D facility following closure and wouldnot need to avail itself of today's rule. However, if it is to be closedwith hazardous waste in place and the unit has already been capped, thecap may only be disturbed under the conditions specified in andSection;andSection;264.117(c) and 265.117(c). This provision requires that the Regional Administratorfind that the disturbance: (1) Is necessary to the proposed use of theproperty and will not increase the potential hazard to human health orthe environment; or (2) is necessary to reduce a threat to human healthand the environment. b. <T3>Ground-Water Monitoring and Corrective Action.</T3> The Agency proposedthat the corrective action requirements in andSection; 265.113(e) applicableto non-retrofitted surface impoundments be triggered by a statisticallysignificant increase in hazardous constituents over background levels (ordecrease in pH levels) for interim status facilities that have not yetestablished a GWPS. Units not in compliance with liner and leachate collectionsystem requirements are subject to accelerated corrective action requirementsconsistent with andSection; 264.113(e)(6) requirements. Several commenters objected to the provisions allowing interim status unitsto delay closure. These commenters argued that interim status ground-watermonitoring requirements do not sufficiently protect human health and theenvironment because they do not accurately detect hazardous waste releases.These commenters also argued that corrective action provisions for interimstatus facilities under delayed closure are inadequately protective ofhuman health and the environment because there is no regulatory authorityto trigger corrective action. The Agency believes that the requirements of andSection; 265.113 (d) and(e) in combination with the other applicable part 265 requirements areadequately protective. These provisions require that units in interim statusmust apply for a permit as a condition of delaying closure, and that uponpermit issuance these units will be subject to the stricter part 264 requirementsfor ground-water monitoring. Additionally, owners or operators of surfaceimpoundments that do not meet MTR liner and leachate collection systemrequirements who wish to delay closure must comply with corrective actionrequirements specified in andSection; 265.113(e) even in the absence of aRCRA andSection; 3008(h) order. Further, contingent corrective measures planscan be incorporated into subsequent section 3008(h) orders if necessary.c. <T3>Applicability to New Interim Status Units.</T3> The Agency proposedthat the option to delay closure be made available to owners or operatorsof units that receive interim status as a result of new regulations. TheAgency indicated in the preamble to the proposed rule that proposed deadlinesfor submitting revised part B applications would be adequate because theseowners or operators would be given sufficient notice that they will becomesubject to Subtitle C requirements. One commenter recommended that the delay of closure option be availableto owners or operators of units that have become classified as hazardouswaste management units as a result of regulatory interpretation by theEPA. As discussed above, this is allowed if the unit meets the requirementsof andSection; 265.113 (d) and (e). The rule has therefore been finalizedas proposed. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. State Authorization </ITAG>A. Applicability of Rules in Authorized States Under section 3006 of RCRA, EPA may authorize qualified States to administerand enforce the RCRA program within the State. (See 40 CFR part 271 forthe standards and requirements for authorization.) Following authorization,EPA retains enforcement authority under RCRA sections 3008, 7003, and 3013,although authorized States have primary enforcement responsibility. Prior to HSWA, a State with final authorization administered its hazardouswaste program entirely in lieu of EPA administering the Federal programin that State. The Federal requirements no longer applied in the authorizedState, and EPA could not issue permits for any facilities in a State wherethe State was authorized to permit. When new, more stringent Federal requirementswere promulgated or enacted, the State was obligated to enact equivalentauthority within specified time frames. New Federal requirements did nottake effect in an authorized State until the State adopted the requirementsas State law. In contrast, under section 3006(g) of RCRA, 42 U.S.C. 6926(g), new requirementsand prohibitions imposed by the HSWA take effect in authorized States atthe same time that they take effect in non-authorized States. EPA is directedto carry out those requirements and prohibitions in authorized States,including the issuance of permits, until the State is granted authorizationto do so. While States must still adopt HSWA-related provisions as Statelaw to retain final authorization, the HSWA requirements and prohibitionsapply in authorized States in the interim.B. Effect of Rule on State Authorizations Today's rule promulgates standards that are not effective in authorizedStates since the requirements are not imposed pursuant to HSWA. Thus, therequirements will be applicable only in those States that do not have interimor final authorization. In authorized States, the requirements will notbe applicable until the State revises its program to adopt equivalent requirementsunder State law. In general, 40 CFR 271.21(e)(2) requires States that have final authorizationto modify their programs to reflect Federal program changes and to subsequentlysubmit the modifications to EPA for approval. It should be noted, however,that authorized States are only required to modify their programs whenEPA promulgates Federal standards that are more stringent or broader inscope than the existing Federal standards. Section 3009 of RCRA allowsStates to impose standards more stringent than those in the Federal program.For those Federal program changes that are less stringent or reduce thescope of the Federal program, States are not required to modify their programs(See 40 CFR 271.1(i)). The standards promulgated today are less stringentthan or reduce the scope of the existing Federal requirements. Therefore,authorized States are not required to modify their programs to adopt requirementsequivalent or substantially equivalent to the provisions promulgated above.If the State does modify its program, EPA must approve the modificationfor the State requirements to become subtitle C RCRA requirements. Statesshould follow the deadlines of 40 CFR 271.21(e)(2) if they desire to adoptthis less stringent requirement. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Executive Order 12291 </ITAG>This regulation was submitted to the Office of Management and Budget forreview as required by Executive Order 12291. The regulatory amendmentsbeing promulgated today are designed to reduce the burden of the RCRA regulationsand are not likely to result in a significant increase in costs. Thus,this final rule is not a major rule; no Regulatory Impact Analysis hasbeen prepared. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>Under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq., </T3>EPA must estimate the paperwork burden created by anyinformation collection request contained in the proposed or final rule.The information collection requirements in this final rule have been approvedby the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the Paperwork ReductionAct, 44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq. and have been assigned OMB control Number 2050-0008.Reporting and recordkeeping burden on the public for this collection isestimated at 320 hours for the 4 respondents, with an average of 80 hoursper response. These burden estimates include all aspects of the collectioneffort and may include time for reviewing instructions, searching existingdata sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, completing andreviewing the collection of information, etc. If you wish to submit comments regarding any aspect of this collectionof information, including suggestions for reducing the burden, or if youwould like a copy of the information collection request (please referenceICR andplusmin;0807), contact Rick Westlund, Information Policy Branch, PM-223,U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC.20460 (202-382-2745); and Marcus Peacock, Office of Information and RegulatoryAffairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington DC. 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG>Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 801 et seq.), Federalagencies must, in developing regulations, analyze their impact on smallentities (small businesses, small government jurisdictions, and small organizations).The amendments promulgated today are more flexible than the existing regulationsand thus result in no additional costs. The viability of small entities,thereby, should not be adversely affected. Accordingly, I certify that this regulation will not have a significantimpact on a substantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: August 2, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William K. Reilly, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, it is proposed that 40 CFR, chapterI be amended as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 264_STANDARDS FOR OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF HAZARDOUS WASTE TREATMENT,STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL FACILlTIES </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 264 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912(a), 6924, and 6925.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 264.13 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(3)(i),and (b)(1) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 264.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General waste analysis </ITAG>(a)(1) Before an owner or operator treats, stores, or disposes of any hazardouswastes, or non-hazardous wastes if applicable under andSection; 264.113(d),he must obtain a detailed chemical and physical analysis of a representativesample of the wastes. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) The analysis must be repeated as necessary to ensure that it is accurateand up to date. At a minimum, the analysis must be repeated: (i) When the owner or operator is notified, or has reason to believe, thatthe process or operation generating the hazardous wastes, or non-hazardouswastes if applicable under andSection; 264.113(d), has changed; and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (1) The parameters for which each hazardous waste, or non-hazardous wasteif applicable under andSection; 264.113(d), will be analyzed and the rationalefor the selection of these parameters (i.e., how analysis for these parameterswill provide sufficient information on the waste's properties to complywith paragraph (a) of this section); <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>3. In andSection; 264.112, is amended by revising paragraph (d)(2) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 264.112 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Closure plan; amendment of plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) * * * (2) The date when he ``expects to begin closure'' must be either: (i) No later than 30 days after the date on which any hazardous waste managementunit receives the known final volume of hazardous wastes, or if there isa reasonable possibility that the hazardous waste management unit willreceive additional hazardous wastes, no later than one year after the dateon which the unit received the most recent volume of hazardous wastes.If the owner or operator of a hazardous waste management unit can demonstrateto the Regional Administrator that the hazardous waste management unitor facility has the capacity to receive additional hazardous wastes andhe has taken all steps to prevent threats to human health and the environment,including compliance with all applicable permit requirements, the RegionalAdministrator may approve an extension to this one-year limit; or (ii) For units meeting the requirements of andSection; 264.113(d), no laterthan 30 days after the date on which the hazardous waste management unitreceives the known final volume of non-hazardous wastes, or if there isa reasonable possibility that the hazardous waste management unit willreceive additional non-hazardous wastes, no later than one year after thedate on which the unit received the most recent volume of non-hazardouswastes. If the owner or operator can demonstrate to the Regional Administratorthat the hazardous waste management unit has the capacity to receive additionalnon-hazardous wastes and he has taken, and will continue to take, all stepsto prevent threats to human health and the environment, including compliancewith all applicable permit requirements, the Regional Administrator mayapprove an extension to this one-year limit. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>4. Section 264.113 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) introductory text,(a)(1)(ii)(A), (b) introductory text, (b)(1)(ii)(A), and (c) and addingparagraphs (d) and (e) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 264.113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Closure; time allowed for closure. </ITAG>(a) Within 90 days after receiving the final volume of hazardous wastes,or the final volume of non-hazardous wastes if the owner or operator complieswith all applicable requirements in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section,at a hazardous waste management unit or facility, the owner or operatormust treat, remove from the unit or facility, or dispose of on-site, allhazardous wastes in accordance with the approved closure plan. The RegionalAdministrator may approve a longer period if the owner or operator complieswith all applicable requirements for requesting a modification to the permitand demonstrates that: (1) * * * (ii)(A) The hazardous waste management unit or facility has the capacityto receive additional hazardous wastes, or has the capacity to receivenon-hazardous wastes if the owner or operator complies with paragraphs(d) and (e) of this section; and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) The owner or operator must complete partial and final closure activitiesin accordance with the approved closure plan and within 180 days afterreceiving the final volume of hazardous wastes, or the final volume ofnon-hazardous wastes if the owner or operator complies with all applicablerequirements in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section, at the hazardouswaste management unit or facility. The Regional Administrator may approvean extension to the closure period if the owner or operator complies withall applicable requirements for requesting a modification to the permitand demonstrates that: (1) * * * (ii)(A) The hazardous waste management unit or facility has the capacityto receive additional hazardous wastes, or has the capacity to receivenon-hazardous wastes if the owner or operator complies with paragraphs(d) and (e) of this section; and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The demonstrations referred to in paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1) of thissection must be made as follows: (1) The demonstrations in paragraph (a)(1) of this section must be madeat least 30 days prior to the expiration of the 90-day period in paragraph(a) of this section; and (2) The demonstration in paragraph (b)(1) of this section must be madeat least 30 days prior to the expiration of the 180-day period in paragraph(b) of this section, unless the owner or operator is otherwise subjectto the deadlines in paragraph (d) of this section. (d) The Regional Administrator may allow an owner or operator to receiveonly non-hazardous wastes in a landfill, land treatment, or surface impoundmentunit after the final receipt of hazardous wastes at that unit if: (1) The owner or operator requests a permit modification in compliancewith all applicable requirements in parts 270 and 124 of this title andin the permit modification request demonstrates that: (i) The unit has the existing design capacity as indicated on the partA application to receive non-hazardous wastes; and(ii) There is a reasonable likelihood that the owner or operator or anotherperson will receive non-hazardous wastes in the unit within one year afterthe final receipt of hazardous wastes; and (iii) The non-hazardous wastes will not be incompatible with any remainingwastes in the unit, or with the facility design and operating requirementsof the unit or facility under this part; and (iv) Closure of the hazardous waste management unit would be incompatiblewith continued operation of the unit or facility; and (v) The owner or operator is operating and will continue to operate incompliance with all applicable permit requirements; and (2) The request to modify the permit includes an amended waste analysisplan, ground-water monitoring and response program, human exposure assessmentrequired under RCRA section 3019, and closure and post-closure plans, andupdated cost estimates and demonstrations of financial assurance for closureand post-closure care as necessary and appropriate, to reflect any changesdue to the presence of hazardous constituents in the non-hazardous wastes,and changes in closure activities, including the expected year of closureif applicable under andSection; 264.112(b)(7), as a result of the receiptof non-hazardous wastes following the final receipt of hazardous wastes;and (3) The request to modify the permit includes revisions, as necessary andappropriate, to affected conditions of the permit to account for the receiptof non-hazardous wastes following receipt of the final volume of hazardouswastes; and (4) The request to modify the permit and the demonstrations referred toin paragraphs (d)(1) and (d)(2) of this section are submitted to the RegionalAdministrator no later than 120 days prior to the date on which the owneror operator of the facility receives the known final volume of hazardouswastes at the unit, or no later than 90 days after the effective date ofthis rule in the state in which the unit is located, whichever is later.(e) In addition to the requirements in paragraph (d) of this section, anowner or operator of a hazardous waste surface impoundment that is notin compliance with the liner and leachate collection system requirementsin 42 U.S.C. 3004(o)(1) and 3005(j)(1) or 42 U.S.C. 3004(o) (2) or (3)or 3005(j) (2), (3), (4) or (13) must: (1) Submit with the request to modify the permit: (i) A contingent corrective measures plan, unless a corrective action planhas already been submitted under andSection; 264.99; and (ii) A plan for removing hazardous wastes in compliance with paragraph(e)(2) of this section; and (2) Remove all hazardous wastes from the unit by removing all hazardousliquids, and removing all hazardous sludges to the extent practicable withoutimpairing the integrity of the liner(s), if any. (3) Removal of hazardous wastes must be completed no later than 90 daysafter the final receipt of hazardous wastes. The Regional Administratormay approve an extension to this deadline if the owner or operator demonstratesthat the removal of hazardous wastes will, of necessity, take longer thanthe allotted period to complete and that an extension will not pose a threatto human health and the environment. (4) If a release that is a statistically significant increase (or decreasein the case of pH) over background values for detection monitoring parametersor constituents specified in the permit or that exceeds the facility'sground-water protection standard at the point of compliance, if applicable,is detected in accordance with the requirements in subpart F of this part,the owner or operator of the unit: (i) Must implement corrective measures in accordance with the approvedcontingent corrective measures plan required by paragraph (e)(1) of thissection no later than one year after detection of the release, or approvalof the contingent corrective measures plan, whichever is later; (ii) May continue to receive wastes at the unit following detection ofthe release only if the approved corrective measures plan includes a demonstrationthat continued receipt of wastes will not impede corrective action; and(iii) May be required by the Regional Administrator to implement correctivemeasures in less than one year or to cease the receipt of wastes untilcorrective measures have been implemented if necessary to protect humanhealth and the environment. (5) During the period of corrective action, the owner or operator shallprovide semi-annual reports to the Regional Administrator that describethe progress of the corrective action program, compile all ground-watermonitoring data, and evaluate the effect of the continued receipt of non-hazardouswastes on the effectiveness of the corrective action. (6) The Regional Administrator may require the owner or operator to commenceclosure of the unit if the owner or operator fails to implement correctiveaction measures in accordance with the approved contingent corrective measuresplan within one year as required in paragraph (e)(4) of this section, orfails to make substantial progress in implementing corrective action andachieving the facility's ground-water protection standard or backgroundlevels if the facility has not yet established a ground-water protectionstandard. (7) If the owner or operator fails to implement corrective measures asrequired in paragraph (e)(4) of this section, or if the Regional Administratordetermines that substantial progress has not been made pursuant to paragraph(e)(6) of this section he shall: (i) Notify the owner or operator in writing that the owner or operatormust begin closure in accordance with the deadlines in paragraphs (a) and(b) of this section and provide a detailed statement of reasons for thisdetermination, and (ii) Provide the owner or operator and the public, through a newspapernotice, the opportunity to submit written comments on the decision no laterthan 20 days after the date of the notice. (iii) If the Regional Administrator receives no written comments, the decisionwill become final five days after the close of the comment period. TheRegional Administrator will notify the owner or operator that the decisionis final, and that a revised closure plan, if necessary, must be submittedwithin 15 days of the final notice and that closure must begin in accordancewith the deadlines in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (iv) If the Regional Administrator receives written comments on the decision,he shall make a final decision within 30 days after the end of the commentperiod, and provide the owner or operator in writing and the public througha newspaper notice, a detailed statement of reasons for the final decision.If the Regional Administrator determines that substantial progress hasnot been made, closure must be initiated in accordance with the deadlinesin paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (v) The final determinations made by the Regional Administrator under paragraphs(e)(7) (iii) and (iv) of this section are not subject to administrativeappeal.4a. A parenthetical is added at the end of the last section in SubpartG of Part 264 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">(The information collection requirements in Subpart G are approvedby the Office of Management and Budget under control number 2050-0008)</ITAG>5. Section 264.142 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 264.142</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cost estimate for closure.</ITAG>(a) * * *(3) The closure cost estimate may not incorporate any salvage value thatmay be realized with the sale of hazardous wastes, or non-hazardous wastesif applicable under andSection; 264.113(d), facility structures or equipment,land, or other assets associated with the facility at the time of partialor final closure.(4) The owner or operator may not incorporate a zero cost for hazardouswastes, or non-hazardous wastes if applicable under andSection; 264.113(d),that might have economic value.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 265_INTERIM STATUS STANDARDS FOR OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF HAZARDOUSWASTE TREATMENT, STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL FACILITIES</ITAG>6. The authority citation for part 265 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912(a), 6924, 6925, and 6935.</ITAG>7. Section 265.13 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(3)(i),and (b)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 265.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General waste analysis.</ITAG>(a)(1) Before an owner or operator treats, stores or disposes of any hazardouswastes, or non-hazardous wastes if applicable under andSection; 265.113(d),he must obtain a detailed chemical and physical analysis of a representativesample of the wastes.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(3) The analysis must be repeated as necessary to ensure that it is accurateand up to date. At a minimum, the analysis must be repeated:(i) When the owner or operator is notified, or has reason to believe, thatthe process or operation generating the hazardous wastes or non-hazardouswastes, if applicable, under andSection;265.113(d) has changed; and<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(1) The parameters for which each hazardous waste, or non-hazardous wasteif applicable under andSection;265.113(d), will be analyzed and the rationalefor the selection of these parameters (i.e., how analysis for these parameterswill provide sufficient information on the waste's properties to complywith paragraph (a) of this section);<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. Section 265.112 is amended by revising paragraph (d)(2) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 265.112</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Closure plan; amendment of plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(2) The date when he ``expects to begin closure'' must be either:(i) Within 30 days after the date on which any hazardous waste managementunit receives the known final volume of hazardous wastes or, if there isa reasonable possibility that the hazardous waste management unit willreceive additional hazardous wastes, no later than one year after the dateon which the unit received the most recent volume of hazardous wastes.If the owner or operator of a hazardous waste management unit can demonstrateto the Regional Administrator that the hazardous waste management unitor facility has the capacity to receive additional hazardous wastes andhe has taken, and will continue to take, all steps to prevent threats tohuman health and the environment, including compliance with all applicableinterim status requirements, the Regional Administrator may approve anextension to this one-year limit; or(ii) For units meeting the requirements of andSection; 265.113(d), no laterthan 30 days after the date on which the hazardous waste management unitreceives the known final volume of non-hazardous wastes, or if there isa reasonable possibility that the hazardous waste management unit willreceive additional non-hazardous wastes, no later than one year after thedate on which the unit received the most recent volume of non-hazardouswastes. If the owner or operator can demonstrate to the Regional Administratorthat the hazardous waste management unit has the capacity to receive additionalnon-hazardous wastes and he has taken, and will continue to take, all stepsto prevent threats to human health and the environment, including compliancewith all applicable interim status requirements, the Regional Administratormay approve an extension to this one-year limit.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>9. Section 265.113 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) introductory text,(a)(1)(ii)(A), (b) introductory text, (b)(1)(ii)(A), and (c) and addingparagraphs (d) and (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 265.113</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Closure; time allowed for closure.</ITAG>(a) Within 90 days after receiving the final volume of hazardous wastes,or the final volume of non-hazardous wastes if the owner or operator complieswith all applicable requirements in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section,at a hazardous waste management unit or facility, or within 90 days afterapproval of the closure plan, whichever is later, the owner or operatormust treat, remove from the unit or facility, or dispose of on-site, allhazardous wastes in accordance with the approved closure plan. The RegionalAdministrator may approve a longer period if the owner or operator demonstratesthat:(1) * * *(ii)(A) The hazardous waste management unit or facility has the capacityto receive additional hazardous wastes, or has the capacity to receivenon-hazardous wastes if the facility owner or operator complies with paragraphs(d) and (e) of this section; and<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) The owner or operator must complete partial and final closure activitiesin accordance with the approved closure plan and within 180 days afterreceiving the final volume of hazardous wastes, or the final volume ofnon-hazardous wastes if the owner or operator complies with all applicablerequirements in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this section, at the hazardouswaste management unit or facility, or 180 days after approval of the closureplan, if that is later. The Regional Administrator may approve an extensionto the closure period if the owner or operator demonstrates that: (1) * * * (ii)(A) The hazardous waste management unit or facility has the capacityto receive additional hazardous wastes, or has the capacity to receivenon-hazardous wastes if the facility owner or operator complies with paragraphs(d) and (e) of this section; and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The demonstrations referred to in paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1) of thissection must be made as follows: (1) The demonstrations in paragraph (a)(1) of this section must be madeat least 30 days prior to the expiration of the 90-day period in paragraph(a) of this section; and (2) The demonstration in paragraph (b)(1) of this section must be madeat least 30 days prior to the expiration of the 180-day period in paragraph(b) of this section, unless the owner or operator is otherwise subjectto the deadlines in paragraph (d) of this section. (d) The Regional Administrator may allow an owner or operator to receivenon-hazardous wastes in a landfill, land treatment, or surface impoundmentunit after the final receipt of hazardous wastes at that unit if: (1) The owner or operator submits an amended part B application, or a partB application, if not previously required, and demonstrates that: (i) The unit has the existing design capacity as indicated on the partA application to receive non-hazardous wastes; and (ii) There is a reasonable likelihood that the owner or operator or anotherperson will receive non-hazardous wastes in the unit within one year afterthe final receipt of hazardous wastes; and (iii) The non-hazardous wastes will not be incompatible with any remainingwastes in the unit or with the facility design and operating requirementsof the unit or facility under this part; and (iv) Closure of the hazardous waste management unit would be incompatiblewith continued operation of the unit or facility; and (v) The owner or operator is operating and will continue to operate incompliance with all applicable interim status requirements; and (2) The part B application includes an amended waste analysis plan, ground-watermonitoring and response program, human exposure assessment required underRCRA section 3019, and closure and post-closure plans, and updated costestimates and demonstrations of financial assurance for closure and post-closure care as necessary and appropriate to reflect any changes due tothe presence of hazardous constituents in the non-hazardous wastes, andchanges in closure activities, including the expected year of closure ifapplicable under andSection; 265.112(b)(7), as a result of the receipt ofnon-hazardous wastes following the final receipt of hazardous wastes; and(3) The part B application is amended, as necessary and appropriate, toaccount for the receipt of non-hazardous wastes following receipt of thefinal volume of hazardous wastes; and (4) The part B application and the demonstrations referred to in paragraphs(d)(1) and (d)(2) of this section are submitted to the Regional Administratorno later than 180 days prior to the date on which the owner or operatorof the facility receives the known final volume of hazardous wastes, orno later than 90 days after the effective date of this rule in the statein which the unit is located, whichever is later. (e) In addition to the requirements in paragraph (d) of this section, anowner or operator of a hazardous waste surface impoundment that is notin compliance with the liner and leachate collection system requirementsin 42 U.S.C. 3004(o)(1) and 3005(j)(1) or 42 U.S.C. 3004(o)(2) or (3) or3005(j) (2), (3), (4) or (13) must: (1) Submit with the part B application: (i) A contingent corrective measures plan; and (ii) A plan for removing hazardous wastes in compliance with paragraph(e)(2) of this section; and (2) Remove all hazardous wastes from the unit by removing all hazardousliquids and removing all hazardous sludges to the extent practicable withoutimpairing the integrity of the liner(s), if any. (3) Removal of hazardous wastes must be completed no later than 90 daysafter the final receipt of hazardous wastes. The Regional Administratormay approve an extension to this deadline if the owner or operator demonstratesthat the removal of hazardous wastes will, of necessity, take longer thanthe allotted period to complete and that an extension will not pose a threatto human health and the environment. (4) If a release that is a statistically significant increase (or decreasein the case of pH) in hazardous oonstituents over background levels isdetected in accordance with the requirements in subpart F of this part,the owner or operator of the unit: (i) Must implement corrective measures in accordance with the approvedcontingent corrective measures plan required by paragraph (e)(1) of thissection no later than one year after detection of the release, or approvalof the contingent corrective measures plan, whichever is later; (ii) May receive wastes at the unit following detection of the releaseonly if the approved corrective measures plan includes a demonstrationthat continued receipt of wastes will not impede corrective action; and(iii) May be required by the Regional Administrator to implement correctivemeasures in less than one year or to cease receipt of wastes until correctivemeasures have been implemented if necessary to protect human health andthe environment. (5) During the period of corrective action, the owner or operator shallprovide semi-annual reports to the Regional Administrator that describethe progress of the corrective action program, compile all ground-watermonitoring data, and evaluate the effect of the continued receipt of non-hazardouswastes on the effectiveness of the corrective action. (6) The Regional Administrator may require the owner or operator to commenceclosure of the unit if the owner or operator fails to implement correctiveaction measures in accordance with the approved contingent corrective measuresplan within one year as required in paragraph (e)(4) of this section, orfails to make substantial progress in implementing corrective action andachieving the facility's background levels. (7) If the owner or operator fails to implement corrective measures asrequired in paragraph (e)(4) of this section, or if the Regional Administratordetermines that substantial progress has not been made pursuant to paragraph(e)(6) of this section he shall: (i) Notify the owner or operator in writing that the owner or operatormust begin closure in accordance with the deadline in paragraphs (a) and(b) of this section and provide a detailed statement of reasons for thisdetermination, and (ii) Provide the owner or operator and the public, through a newspapernotice, the opportunity to submit written comments on the decision no laterthan 20 days after the date of the notice. (iii) If the Regional Administrator receives no written comments, the decisionwill become final five days after the close of the comment period. TheRegional Administrator will notify the owner or operator that the decisionis final, and that a revised closure plan, if necessary, must be submittedwithin 15 days of the final notice and that closure must begin in accordancewith the deadlines in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (iv) If the Regional Administrator receives written comments on the decision,he shall make a final decision within 30 days after the end of the commentperiod, and provide the owner or operator in writing and the public througha newspaper notice, a detailed statement of reasons for the final decision.If the Regional Administrator determines that substantial progress hasnot been made, closure must be initiated in accordance with the deadlinesin paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (v) The final determinations made by the Regional Administrator under paragraphs(e)(7) (iii) and (iv) of this section are not subject to administrativeappeal.9a. A parenthetical is added at the end of the last section in subpartG of Part 265 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">(The information collection requirements in Subpart G are approvedby the Office of Management and Budget under control number 2050-0008)</ITAG>10. In andSection; 265.142 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3) and (a)(4)to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;265.142 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cost estimate for closure. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) The closure cost estimate may not incorporate any salvage value thatmay be realized with the sale of hazardous wastes, or non-hazardous wastesif applicable under andSection; 265.113(d), facility structures or equipment,land, or other assets associated with the facility at the time of partialor final closure. (4) The owner or operator may not incorporate a zero cost for hazardouswastes, or non-hazardous wastes if applicable under andSection; 265.113(d),that might have economic value. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 270_EPA ADMINISTERED PERMIT PROGRAMS: THE HAZARDOUS WASTE PERMITPROGRAM </ITAG>11. The authority citation for part 270 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912, 6924, 6925, 6927, 6939, and 6974.</ITAG>12. In andSection; 270.42, the list of permit modifications in Appendix Iis amended by adding D.1.f. to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permit modification at the request of the permittee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1,i1,s10,6 </C>  Appendix I to andSection; 270.42_Classification ofPermit Modifications<H1>Modifications </H1><H1>Class</H1> <ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    * </ITAG>D. * * * <ITAG tagnum="22">1. * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">f. Extension of the closure period to allow a landfill, surface impoundmentor land treatment unit to receive non-hazardous wastes after final receiptof hazardous wastes under andSection; 264.113 (d) and (e)<D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-18499 Filed 8-11-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>